The Oppressed
By: Max Wang


Chapter 1: Nathan, July
        Nathan Francis was a 23-year-old man from Elmwood Village. He was a normal man, with a normal job and a normal life. Nathan had completed high school, graduated from college, and gotten a job at Alpha Market, a local supermarket operated by the renowned Knox Corporation. He chose this job because of the high salary Knox Corporation provided, and how easy it was to work there. In addition, Knox Corporation claimed to be a very sustainable company through the usage of wind turbine power plants, which are tall turbines that convert the kinetic energy of wind into electricity.
Nathan was definitely the right person for the job…he was friendly, hardworking, and optimistic. Slowly, he began climbing the ranks, becoming more and more popular and well-known amongst his colleagues. In one year alone, Nathan had gone from a plain cashier to a store manager. Now, Nathan was getting ready to be promoted to a factory worker and finally get a job at the Knox Corporation headquarters (which was, interestingly, right next to Elmwood Village…). However, in the back of his mind, there was one thing troubling Nathan…the population of his village was dropping fast, almost at the same rate he was climbing the ranks…
Chapter 2: Elmwood Village, July
Elmwood Village was a modest and peaceful community. The residents of the village were cordial and warm, and everyone enjoyed their humble, quiet lives. However, that all changed drastically. While Elmwood Village had an initial population of  12,368 in January, it had unusually dropped to 11, 243 by March. Everyone thought that the sudden drop in population was expected, since the flu was exceptionally strong that year, but this claim would be completely dismissed in May, when the population plummeted to 7,089. Then, in July, the population dropped again, resulting in only 5,321 people remaining. In a matter of a few months, more than half of the people in Elmwood Village had mysteriously passed away. The once  bright, cheerful Elmwood Village had become dreadful and dark. Cries of family and friends could be heard from almost anywhere, nearly every house was draped in black, and swarms of pallbearers marched down every street. Local news reported that such an extreme drop in population had only ever been seen in places that had experienced nuclear disaster. Worst of all, nobody knew how to stop this dreadful crisis.
While everybody was frantically searching for ways to protect their families, Nathan was pondering on how to find a cure. After a while of thought, he concluded two things. Firstly, every poor soul that had passed away died from the same cause: cancer. Secondly, the deaths coincidentally started happening the same month Knox Corporation opened its factory right next to Elmwood Village…


Chapter 3: The Factory, July
Nathan was very excited for his first day as a factory worker. With this new job, he would get almost 50% more money than a store worker. In addition, many others had told him how grand and stunning Knox Corporation’s factory was. However, he was still staggered to see how immense and great the factory actually was with his own eyes. Unable to accept that he would be working in an environment so different from the miniscule Alpha Market, Nathan eagerly rushed inside to see what was in store for him. As he passed through the huge steel gates that encircled the factory, Nathan saw thousands of workers operating on enormous machines that processed the ingredients and turned them into food products. Giant tubes carrying ingredients for the Knox Corporation’s famous food products ran throughout the factory, which passed into places where they would then be processed and packaged. Nathan was assigned to work on one of the ingredient-mixing machines that mixed dough and other elements together. These ingredients would then be baked into bread in another part of the machine. The other workers had told him that their job was quite easy; they just had to supervise the machines and monitor the heat of the baker. Nathan was confused at first, since he had originally thought that his job would be placing food on conveyor belts and dumping ingredients into buckets. However, his colleagues had laughed and told him that the factory was mostly run by machines, and the only humans needed were workers. Nathan’s colleagues had also told him to focus on working instead of asking questions. They said that although there weren’t any managers in the factory, Knox Corporation always seemed to know what they were doing…
By now, Nathan had started to notice a few strange things around the factory. For one, there were lots of security cameras all over the factory. At first, it seemed that the cameras were just for security, but after trying to count every single one he saw (there were just too many), Nathan concluded that the overwhelming number of security cameras were not just there for that. Secondly, all of the machines and tubes were enclosed, so nobody knew what was happening inside of them or what ingredients they were carrying… This made Nathan suspect that Knox Corporation didn’t want their employees and the public to know what ingredients or additives they were putting in their foods. Finally, after counting how many machines there were in the factory, Nathan was certain that the amount of energy required to operate such immense machines and tubes was at least double the amount of energy a wind turbine power plant could produce. After pondering over all of these, Nathan was certain that Knox Corp. was hiding something. However, it didn’t seem to be anything harmful or illegal, so Nathan continued to work hard and tried to stop worrying about these things.


Chapter 4: The Offices, September
        It had happened again. The population of Elmwood Village had once again plummeted, and with that, Nathan had been promoted. During his time at the factory, Nathan had been a great leader. He maintained friendly relationships with everyone, he performed his work diligently, and he had helped with many things like repairing a control station, introducing the factory to new recruits, and even creating a scrumptious new food product. Seeing that he was a natural leader, Knox Corp. had generously decided to promote Nathan to an executive who was allowed to work at the offices.
Nathan, as always, was very excited for his new job. He wondered if he would be as amazed as he was last time about his new workplace. As Nathan boarded the private bus Knox Corp. had sent to take him to the Offices, he noticed that there were security cameras everywhere and that the bus didn’t even have a driver. Instead, it was AI-controlled and Nathan felt very uncomfortable looking around at all the security cameras, so he straightened his posture, tried to act as serious as possible, and quietly waited.
One hour later…
        Nathan stretched his legs as the bus doors automatically opened. It had been a long ride, and trying to maintain a good posture for that long was very exhausting. As he exited the car, Nathan gazed at his surroundings and felt a little bit confused. He had expected the Knox Corporation Offices to be in a large and crowded city. Instead, they were here, in an isolated desert. As Nathan approached the sleek, black doors leading into the offices, two burly security guards, both carrying M16s, stopped him and demanded his ID card. Nathan was very frightened, but then maintained a relaxed composure and pulled out his new ID card Knox Corp. had just given him for inspection. After observing the ID card, the guards almost instantly smiled and welcomed “Mr. Nathan Francis” (as they had called him) into the office. When he entered the office building, Nathan immediately recognized the familiar presence of security cameras everywhere. Indifferent, Nathan walked up a flight of stairs to his room, eager to start working. However, at the top, he was met with a horrifying sight. Hundreds of managers stared down at their computers, closely monitoring everything that was happening through the security cameras. Nathan’s hypothesis was confirmed. He now knew for a fact that every single security camera he had seen was being watched. The lack of privacy made him quite wary, so Nathan hurried down the corridor and into his office. Inside his office, Nathan found a simple desk, an office chair, and a huge monitor. After swiping his ID card to open the computer, Nathan noticed that Knox Corporation had sent him a file labeled the “Executive Loyalty Examination”. After Nathan clicked on it, a series of instructions popped up. It said that Nathan had to complete the test to prove his loyalty to Knox Corporation. It also said that this was required in order for him to start his job as an executive. Although he was puzzled as to why he had to do a test to show his loyalty, Nathan still filled out the test. However, just when he was about to submit, another file popped up on his screen. This time, he knew it wasn’t from Knox Corp. as it was labeled S.O.L.A.R.sAvEm0nths3579.exe. At first, Nathan was unsure of whether to click it or not, wondering if it might be a virus. However, his curiosity ultimately prevailed, and Nathan clicked the file. Instantly, bold and black letters appeared in front of his screen.
KNOX CORPORATION IS NOT WHAT YOU THINK IT IS. IT HAS BEEN DAMAGING ELMWOOD VILLAGE AND HIDING FROM US FOR FAR TOO LONG. YOUR VILLAGE’S EXTREME DROP IN POPULATION IS NOT NATURAL, IT IS LINKED TO YOUR COMPANY. JOIN US TO UNCOVER KNOX CORPORATION’S DARK SECRETS. JOIN US TO FREE YOUR VILLAGE AND SAVE EVERYONE YOU LOVE. JOIN US.  -    S.O.L.A.R.[a][b][c][d]
To be continued…

The Quiet Rebellion
By: Max Wang


Recap: In the Oppressed, we followed the story of Nathan Francis, a 23-year-old man from Elmwood Village. Nathan had originally been a cashier at the local Alpha Market, but since he performed exceptionally well, he quickly got promoted to a factory worker. He would continue to climb up the ranks, becoming an executive who was allowed to work in the Offices. Unfortunately, his villages’ population was dropping just as fast as he was climbing the ranks. In January, there were 12,368 people. Then, the population plummeted, and in July, there were only 5,321 people alive. At the same time, Nathan began to notice a few strange things about the company, Knox Corporation. At first, he did not think that Knox Corp. was linked to the villages’ extreme population decline. This, however, all changed on Nathan’s first day at the Offices after a mysterious file popped up on his screen…
Chapter 4.5: The ending of The Oppressed
This time, he recognized that the file wasn’t from Knox Corp. as it was labeled S.O.L.A.R.sAvEm0nths3579.exe. At first, Nathan was reluctant to click it, wondering if it might be some sort of a virus. However, his curiosity ultimately prevailed, and Nathan clicked on the file. Instantly, bold and black letters appeared in front of his screen.
KNOX CORPORATION IS NOT WHAT YOU THINK IT IS. IT HAS BEEN DAMAGING ELMWOOD VILLAGE AND HIDING FROM US FOR FAR TOO LONG. YOUR VILLAGE’S EXTREME DROP IN POPULATION IS UNNATURAL AND IT IS DIRECTLY LINKED TO YOUR COMPANY. JOIN US TO UNCOVER KNOX CORPORATION’S DARK SECRETS. JOIN US TO FREE YOUR VILLAGE AND SAVE EVERYONE YOU LOVE. JOIN US.
 - S.O.L.A.R.
Chapter 5: Dilemma
        Nathan was dumbfounded. He didn't know what to do. He buried his head into his arms as his heart and mind raced. After quite a while of shock, Nathan began to ponder the message. Now that a mysterious organization had sent him this message linking Knox Corp. to Elmwood Village’s population decrease, Nathan began to connect the dots. He remembered how secretive Knox Corporation was. There were security cameras everywhere, no one could see what was happening inside the food processors, and the Offices were situated in a secluded desert. Not to mention, Knox Corp. had definitely been lying about using wind turbine power plants to supply energy, since it was impossible to produce such an immense amount of power using the kinetic energy of wind. However, Nathan was still troubled by a few important questions: How were these things linked to his villages’ population drop? What evidence was there to prove these claims? What is S.O.L.A.R.? Nathan was trapped in a dilemma. He didn’t know whether to trust Knox Corporation or S.O.L.A.R. Despite this, Nathan was certain about one thing: He had to save his village.
Chapter 6: The Meeting
        That night, Nathan didn’t sleep well. He kept wrestling with who to trust, Knox Corp. or S.O.L.A.R. One was a secretive, suspicious company, while the other was a cryptic and unknown organization. The next day, Nathan came to work weary (he didn’t sleep at all) but excited. On the bus ride, Nathan had thought of an idea that could give him information about both Knox Corp. and S.O.L.A.R. He would send an undisclosed message to S.O.L.A.R. saying that he is indeed skeptical of Knox Corp. However, he would also say that he doesn’t fully trust S.O.L.A.R., and therefore that he required an explanation in order for him to join the organization. After sending this message, Nathan almost immediately got a response:
Hello, Nathan. These are indeed very good questions to ask. However, we cannot reveal these details to you right now, since we cannot fully trust you, and you are being watched. Nevertheless, we will eventually give you the information you need. We will send you a messenger in three days from now at midnight. They will bring you to us, and we will have a crucial meeting.
Three days later…
Nathan stood outside his door, waiting for the messenger to arrive. At 12:00 sharp, a sleek, black car stopped in his driveway. A man wearing black sunglasses stepped out of the car and walked up to Nathan. As he shook Nathan’s hand, he beckoned him towards the car. Reluctantly, Nathan entered the car…
“Hello, Nathan. It is a pleasure to meet you. I’ve heard a lot about you and your actions, and I believe you would really make a great addition to our team.”
“You knew about me already? How?”
The cryptic man chuckled and motioned to the driver. “Why, of course it's because of him!”
The driver turned around and smiled at Nathan. Nathan was so shocked to see who it was, he almost fell off his seat. “Robin!?” He exclaimed.
To Nathan’s disbelief, the driver was Nathan’s best friend, Robin Bernard. The mysterious man explained that his name was Raynell, and that he was the head of S.O.L.A.R. He also told Nathan how he had met Robin, and what they knew about Knox Corporation.
        “Thirteen years ago, I created the Society of Liberation and Rescue, abbreviated as S.O.L.A.R. This organization has been aiding people and animals from around the world. Our organization has saved countless animals from abuse and found cures for unknown diseases. Two years ago, I met your friend, Robin. He is a brilliant man, as you should know, and he found a cure for a deadly disease known as KOVID-29. This year, he told me about your villages’ extreme drop in population. We both know that this is very unusual, and that there must be some cause for this. We began by investigating the cause of the deaths. Since everyone who passed away died of cancer, we started looking for cancer cells. For the first six months, we found nothing, but just a month ago, we found out that the soil, air, and water in your village contains lethal amounts of radioactivity that has caused the residents to develop cancer. We also found out that there were many illegal additives in Alpha Market’s food products. Due to this, we began to secretly investigate your company, Knox Corporation. We concluded two very important points: Firstly, Knox Corporation is very corrupt, and it is putting many illegal additives in its products that can cause cancer. Secondly, the radioactivity in your villages’ soil may suggest that there is nuclear waste, although we don’t know where it came from and why it’s there.”
“So is that what you want me to investigate?”
“Correct. Since you are a high-ranking executive, you have the right to inquire about any company secrets. However, for them to fully let their guard down, you must fill out the Executive Loyalty Examination.”
“But…the final question on the form says that you must swear on your life that you will never betray Knox Corp.”
“Are the consequences actually that harsh and strict?”
“Yes. Knox Corporation has hundreds of thousands of security cameras everywhere, and I think they even have their own SWAT force.”
Raynell pondered for a moment, and then asked Nathan, “We will try to send reinforcements, but this mission will still be very risky, and possibly even life threatening. Would you still like to participate? I would understand if you-”
“Yes. I will participate in this mission, no matter the cost. I must save my village and everyone I hold dear to me.”
“Thank you, Nathan. Thank you for striving to save the people of this society.”
Chapter 7: The Plan
        At S.O.L.A.R. headquarters in Athensvale, Raynell introduced Nathan to everyone else. They all liked Nathan very much and admired him for his bravery. Raynell convened a meeting with everybody else in the organization. He explained that Nathan would continue to work at Knox Corp. undercover and collect as much information on Elmwood Village’s population decline as possible. He also split S.O.L.A.R. into two groups: One would investigate the radioactivity in Elmwood Village, while the other would reinforce Nathan and help relay information. Finally, Raynell gave an stirring speech that moved everyone to tears, restating the purpose of S.O.L.A.R.: Liberation and Rescue, no matter what.
After the meeting, everyone, especially Nathan, was determined to save Elmwood Village. As he headed home, Nathan thought about the challenges he was now about to face. He was now a special man, with a special job and a special life.
To be continued…
The Truth
By: Max Wang


Recap: In the Quiet Rebellion, we followed the story of Nathan Francis, a 23-year-old man from Elmwood Village. After receiving a mysterious message from a cryptic organization called S.O.L.A.R., Nathan grew suspicious of his company, Knox Corp. When he first joined Knox Corp., half a year ago, the population of Elmwood Village began plummeting unnaturally. At first, Nathan didn't think that his village’s extreme drop in population was linked to his company. This is because everyone believed at first that the deaths were caused by the abnormally strong flu. However, after S.O.L.A.R. sent a message to Nathan informing him that his company was linked to the population drop, Nathan connected the dots. He organized a meeting with S.O.L.A.R. 's leader, Raynell, and discovered that his best friend, Robin Bernard, was also a member of S.O.L.A.R. In addition to this, Nathan also found out that his village contained lethal amounts of radiation, and that Knox Corporation’s food products held illegal additives that caused cancer. As a result, Nathan joined S.O.L.A.R., and he was assigned a difficult and extremely important task: Nathan would go undercover as an agent and reveal Knox Corporation’s dark secrets and save his village…


The day after the meeting…


Chapter 8: The Loyalty Examination
        The next day, Nathan came to the Knox Corp. Offices with an anxious expression and a thin, sealed smile. Every time he saw a “security” camera, Nathan would picture himself getting caught and arrested by Knox Corporation’s “security” officers. As Nathan approached the sleek doors leading into the Offices, he saw a bunch of SWAT officers, wearing kevlar vests, and holding shiny, lethal M16s. He imagined his head being pierced by their bullets and felt as scared as a mouse in a snake’s den. Nathan quickly hurried up the stairs and into his office cubicle, since he didn’t want to see any more security cameras or supervisors. After regaining his composure, he opened his computer and started the first step of his mission: The Executive Loyalty Examination. Nathan quickly filled out the form and answered every question without hesitation...until he got to the last question. It said:
Question #44
WILL YOU SWEAR ON YOUR LIFE THAT YOU WILL NEVER BETRAY KNOX CORPORATION?
        Option 1: Yes
        Option 2: ?
        Nathan took a deep breath and once again pictured himself getting arrested and executed. However, this time, he also remembered the pain and agony of his neighbors, who both died of cancer the first month Nathan got hired at Knox Corp. Determined, Nathan checked the yes option and submitted the form. In less than a second, a message from Knox Corp. appeared on Nathan’s computer screen:
Thank you for filling out the form.
REMEMBER–IF YOU BETRAY KNOX CORPORATION, NOTHING SHALL SAVE YOU FROM YOUR FATE.
YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED.
Chapter 9: The Investigation
        After filling out the Executive Loyalty Examination, Nathan was formally allowed to start his work at the Offices. His job was quite simple; he only had to attend Knox Corp. board meetings and contribute to their discussions. However, the most crucial part of Nathan’s job was not this, instead, it was an annual factory check. Every year, all of the executives would gather together at the Knox Corp. factories and for one week straight, they would perform test after test on every single machine and tube in the factory to check if any were broken or in need of maintenance. When Nathan used to be a factory worker, he had experienced the annual factory inspection. He could still clearly recall the day when all of the factory workers were suddenly ushered out of the factory. They were then escorted onto huge black buses that delivered each of them home. When Nathan had inquired about why they had to go off duty so early, one of his colleagues had informed him that it was most likely because of this annual factory check that forced everyone to return home early. Now, after having remembered all of these things about the annual factory inspection, Nathan concluded that the factory check must be very secretive. This is because none of the factory workers were allowed to see it, and the inspection took an entire week. Nathan also realized that since the annual factory check was so secretive, he would definitely be able to uncover some confidential information when he inspected the factory…


Three months later…


        It was finally time for the long awaited factory inspection. During the previous night, Nathan had sent a private message to Raynell. In it, Nathan indicated that he would inform Raynell of any secrets that he would uncover during the week of the factory check. The next day, Nathan boarded the huge buses that Knox Corporation had sent, and after an hour-long drive, he arrived at the Knox Corp. factory. Just like before, Nathan saw that all of the factory workers had been led into buses and taken back to their homes. After there was no one left, Nathan and the other executives exited their buses and entered the factory. Inside, it looked the exact same way it had on the day Nathan got promoted. Humongous food processors were present throughout the factory, and gigantic tubes were hooked up to all of the machines. Nathan suddenly felt a surge of nostalgia and excitement, so he strolled into the immense factory and began inspecting.


        Over the course of the next six days, Nathan and the other executives inspected every single inch of every single machine and tube in the factory. They performed meticulous inspections on each food processor and even checked all of the security cameras in the factory. Unfortunately, Nathan was too busy checking the food processors, and as a result, he didn’t have any time to start investigating. Due to this, he became increasingly bored and discouraged, seeing that the factory inspection would not reveal any of Knox Corporation’s secrets. However, on the night of the sixth day, one of the chief executives told everyone that the seventh day would be the most important, and that there would be hundreds of SWAT officers guarding outside the factory. Alarmed, Nathan quickly sent a private message to S.O.L.A.R. headquarters, telling them that he would uncover the truth on the next day.


The next day…


        After eating breakfast, Nathan and the other executives hurried into the factory at 9:00 sharp. When they arrived, the chief executive was already there. He gave everyone a speech about loyalty and secrecy, and informed them that they would be inspecting confidential things today. Then, the chief executive led Nathan and the other executives to the back of the factory and into a secret door concealed inside the wall…


        It was at this moment that Nathan realized the truth. It was at this moment that Nathan broke through all of Knox Corporation’s lies. It was at this moment that he knew why his village was being devastated by cancer.


        It was all because of Knox Corporation’s nuclear power plant. Nathan had finally connected all the dots together. He now knew how Knox Corp. produced enough energy to power all of the machines in the factory. He now knew why Knox Corporation was so secretive. Most importantly, he now knew why his village’s population was plummeting so rapidly…


        The nuclear power plant’s radioactive waste was being dumped in Elmwood Village.


To be continued…
The Catalyst
By: Max Wang


Recap: In The Truth, we followed the adventures of Nathan Francis, a 23-year-old man from Elmwood Village. After joining S.O.L.A.R. (a.k.a. The Society of Liberation and Rescue), Nathan became an undercover agent to uncover Knox Corporation’s secrets and discover why his village’s population was decreasing so rapidly. During the annual factory inspection, Nathan was led into a secret room concealed behind a hidden door at the back of the factory. In this room, Nathan discovered that Knox Corp. was using a nuclear power plant to power its massive machines. He finally realized that his village’s population was dropping because Knox Corporation was dumping its radioactive waste there. Now, he was ready to denounce Knox Corp.’s crimes to the world and save his village…


Chapter 10: The Arrest


        Nathan now knew everything. He knew his company’s darkest secrets. He knew why his village’s population was dropping so substantially. Nathan’s mind was racing and he was trembling with anger and disbelief. He had never imagined that Knox Corporation would do such a sinister thing to innocent people. As he held back his anger, Nathan took a few deep breaths and attempted to regain his composure. He hid behind the other executives and listened to the chief executive’s orders. The chief told everyone to wear radiation suits and inspect the nuclear power plant. For the entire day, Nathan and the other executives monitored the plant inch by inch and recorded the temperature. At multiple points throughout the inspection, Nathan was very tempted to grab his phone and photograph all of the evidence. However, he refrained because he knew that individuals all around were actively watching him. At night, the chief executive gathered everyone and gave them a speech. He told them that the nuclear power plant’s waste was dumped every two months in an abandoned village called Elmwood Village and that no one would be harmed by the radioactive waste. After hearing this, Nathan was infuriated by Knox Corp.’s blatant lies. He quickly took out his phone and asked the chief executive to repeat what he had just said. As the chief repeated his words, Nathan started recording his words and sent them to Raynell. Now, he was sure that his plan would succeed.


        That night, as everyone fell asleep, Nathan secretly exited his camp and walked towards the factory. It was already midnight, and the factory had closed. However, there was still a squadron of SWAT guards patrolling the factory. Nathan hid behind the perimeter fence and inched his way to the back door. At the door, he swiped his ID and entered the factory. Nathan quickly navigated his way to the secret door and entered the nuclear power plant. In this plant, he proceeded to take a lot of photos, specifically of the interior and the exterior of the plant. When he was finished, Nathan snuck out of the power plant and tried to exit the building. All of a sudden though, an alarm went off! SWAT guards burst into the factory and immediately began  searching for Nathan. Nathan sprinted back inside the power plant and frantically sent the photos to Raynell. Just as he finished, the guards burst into the room. Nathen knew that he was going to be captured, so he threw his phone into the power plant’s core and prepared to die…






Chapter 11: The Evidence


At S.O.L.A.R. HQ…


        Upon midnight’s arrivals, Raynell suddenly received all of the messages Nathan had previously sent. He was surprised but nonetheless ecstatic to see that Nathan had finally cracked the code and found evidence of Knox Corp.’s illegal actions. After saving the photos and recordings into the S.O.L.A.R. database, he texted Nathan to ask how he was doing. However, after half an hour, Nathan still did not answer. He even tried to call him, but his phone was unresponsive. Now, Raynell started to panic. He knew that something must have happened to Nathan. He quickly called a meeting and informed everyone that Nathan was in grave danger. Robin was especially shaken by this since Nathan had been his best friend since kindergarten. However, he knew that there was still some hope. In addition, he also inferred that Knox Corp. would try to get information out of Nathan before executing him. Due to this, he told everyone to calm down and that he had a plan. Robin said that S.O.L.A.R. should secretly give the evidence to the government so they could rescue Nathan for themselves and arrest the heads of Knox Corp. Although the other members of S.O.L.A.R. were skeptical, they had no choice but to follow through with Robin’s plan.


3 hours later…


        Robin finished organizing all of the evidence and prepared to make the phone call. Since S.O.L.A.R. was a security and anti-crime organization, they had direct access to the phone number of the chief commander of the U.S. Army. After Robin dialed the number, his call was almost immediately answered. He introduced himself as a member of the Society of Liberation and Rescue, and he informed the chief commander of the population drop of Elmwood Village. Robin also told him that Knox Corporation was behind all of this, and showed the commander all of the evidence Nathan had gathered. The chief commander was appalled that Knox Corp. would do such a thing since three of his family members worked there. He also asked what the army could do to help resolve this situation. Robin informed him that they had an undercover agent in Knox Corp., but that he had been captured a few hours back. He also told the commander that S.O.L.A.R. wanted the army to secretly rescue Nathan and then raid the offices. The chief agreed and said that he would assign a task force to carry out the operations. Robin thanked him graciously and hung up.


Chapter 12: The Operation


U.S. Army HQ


        The chief commander immediately organized a task force after the phone call. He told them to secretly break into the offices and rescue a member of S.O.L.A.R. named Nathan. The task force he assigned was one of the best rescue forces in the entire army. It consisted of ten professionally trained officers with fifteen years of experience each. They were all armed with Vectors and MG36s and wore specially designed Kevlar suits. As they left for their mission, the chief commander informed S.O.L.A.R. and began to arrange an assault battalion.


S.O.L.A.R. HQ


        Robin and Raynell were ecstatic to hear that the task force had left but were also worried that Nathan would be executed before they arrived. They tried to gather as much information as possible and figure out where Nathan was being imprisoned. From what they knew, they inferred that Nathan was being kept on the third floor of the offices. It was where all of the confidential meetings were held, and where Knox Corp. kept all of its secret plans. It was also where the task force was headed…


The Knox Corporation Offices, Third Floor


        BANG! BANG BANG! SMASH! The gates of the offices collapsed as the specialized task force dove in. They threw smoke bombs and put on their thermal night vision goggles to see through the smoke. The offices erupted into chaos as everyone bolted out the door. The task force took advantage of this and quickly hurried up to the third floor. They broke through a steel door and entered the high-executive meeting room. There, they started searching for the place where Nathan was kept. After five minutes of inspection, they found a secret trapdoor under the meeting table. However, they didn’t immediately burst into the room. Instead, they sent down a few drones to survey the area. They found out that there was a jail room below the trapdoor reinforced with a row of turrets. The drones quickly fired at the turrets and successfully destroyed them. The task force then proceeded to open the trapdoor and approached the jail with caution. Inside, they found an unconscious man lying on the floor. The soldiers recognized him as Nathan Francis and quickly carried him out of the room. Just as they exited the room and closed the trapdoor, the alarm sounded. A message was broadcast over the intercom:


SELF-DESTRUCT SEQUENCE INITIATED
CLUSTER MUNITIONS GOING OFF IN 60, 59, 58, 57, 56, 55…
To be continued…
The Outrage
By: Max Wang


Recap: In The Catalyst, we followed the story of Nathan Francis, a 23-year-old man from Elmwood Village. After photographing evidence of Knox Corp.’s illegal activities, Nathan wastaken prisoner and locked up in the Offices. Fortunately, he was able to send all of the evidence to S.O.L.A.R. HQ. After organizing the information, Robin contacted the U.S. Army and organized a task force to rescue Nathan. The operation was successful, and the soldiers carried Nathan out of the jail cell. As they closed the trapdoor that concealed the room, an alarm suddenly went off, and a message was broadcast over the intercom:


SELF-DESTRUCT SEQUENCE INITIATED
CLUSTER MUNITIONS GOING OFF IN 60, 59, 58, 57, 56, 55…


Chapter 13: The Escape


        The task force instantaneously started bolting towards the exit. The commander ordered the strongest two soldiers to carry Nathan while the others guarded them. At half a minute, the soldiers had already arrived on the second floor, and they burst out the door with exactly ten seconds remaining on the timer for the self-destruct sequence. They hastily hopped onto their transport and sped away, while the Offices simultaneously blew up and erupted into a mushroom cloud. The booming noise woke the unconscious Nathan, and he slowly opened his eyes. The soldiers explained to him that he had been rescued and would be arriving at S.O.L.A.R. HQ in an hour. Nathan breathed a sigh of relief and closed his eyes again.
One hour later…


        The task force safely delivered Nathan to S.O.L.A.R. HQ where he was given a tearful welcome by Robin and Raynell. They all asked him how harshly Knox Corp. had treated him, and to their surprise, Nathan said that they didn’t really mistreat him in any way. However, he did say that they intended to put him in the electric chair to force out information. Thankfully, the guards arrived just in time to rescue Nathan before he was to be tortured. Afterward, the members of S.O.L.A.R. discussed the best way to denounce Knox Corp.’s sinister actions to the public. They decided that the heads of the company should be arrested first before the news came out. However, there was a slight problem: The infiltration of the Offices had alarmed the leaders, so they were now in hiding. Nathan also knew this, and he was ready to find them and bring them to justice.


        Chapter 14: The Hunt


        One fateful afternoon, Nathan called the U.S. Army headquarters and reported that he had collected key information as to the whereabouts of the leaders of Knox Corp. The night prior, he was thinking about where the heads of the company could hide when all of a sudden, he remembered something. Nathan remembered when he was just a cashier in Alpha Market, and when he didn’t know a single thing about the Knox Corporation. He could still clearly remember the day when the wall in the storage room of the market suddenly collapsed and almost crushed him. The official explanation was that the wall was ‘very old’, and that heavy rain had seeped through the roof and eroded the cement, thus causing the wall to collapse. At the time, Nathan believed this excuse, seeing as he had no other explanation. However, he had an alternative now: Hidden behind the wall was a secret room perfect for hiding people.


        After telling the chief commander about his suspicions, he was quickly assigned to a task force to investigate the whereabouts of the leaders of Knox Corp. That night, Nathan secretly infiltrated the Alpha Market alongside the task force and led them to the storage room. The soldiers quietly placed a C4 on the wall and waited for a few seconds before…BOOM! The bomb exploded and revealed a massive hole in the wall. The soldiers rushed in with XM8s while a group of soldiers carrying snipers stayed behind with AWPs. Nathan stayed in the middle with a Deagle in hand and warily entered the dark hole in the wall. As they ventured deeper and deeper, Nathan felt as though they were descending into a hideout. His suspicions were confirmed when he saw specks of light and heard shouting in the distance. The soldiers had also heard the noises, and they traced the source of the noise. Nathan followed behind, and after a minute or so, they arrived at another door. This time, however, it was adorned in decorations and vibrant paint. Nathan grasped that the leaders of Knox Corp. were most likely hiding in a room behind the door and that they were still unaware of the task force’s presence. As the commander gave a silent countdown, the soldiers readied their guns and prepared to burst in.


3…2…1…GO! GO! GO!


The soldiers and Nathan, charged in and immediately began arresting the heads of Knox Corp., one by one. They were all in shock and were horrified that the U.S. army [a][b]had come to apprehend them, so most of them simply surrendered and begged for mercy. A few others, however, were able to escape the fray and quickly disappeared down the massive hallway. The commander ordered a group of soldiers to pursue them, and Nathan immediately followed suit. He walked down to the farthest room and discovered a tunnel behind the king-sized bed. Nathan called for the members of the task force, and they accompanied him into the passage. After a while of crawling, they caught up with the fugitives and handcuffed them. The task force herded all of the convicts back into Alpha Market and intopolice cars called by S.O.L.A.R. Thus, the heads of Knox Corp. were captured, and all that Nathan needed to do was to reveal their crimes to the public.




Epilogue: 1 month later…


        Knox Corporation’s actions had been officially revealed to the public, and everyone was shocked. All of the stores Knox Corp. owned and operated were permanently shut down, and its leaders were expecting a trial soon. This scandal stayed on the breaking news list for nearly an entire month, topping the charts for the most viewed event in the 21st century.[c] S.O.L.A.R. began receiving wave after wave of media attention, and Nathan, Robin, and Raynell were awarded dozens of badges and honorable titles. However, the awards and the praise weren’t the things that made Nathan happy—instead, it was the new medicine that was developed for the people in his village who had contracted cancer because of Knox Corp.’s actions. Now, Elmwood Village was truly saved, and Nathan could finally breathe a sigh of relief. Yet, one thing remained true: Nathan Francis was a special man, with a special job, a special life, and a special past and future.[d][e][f]

Kurma: The Monk in Isolation
By: Max Wang

	A cloudless, blood red sky. Thousands of bodies litter the desert as the battle rages on. Two warriors, side by side, rush at the hooded man on the top of the sand dune. The hooded man smiles slightly and suddenly releases a fireball conjured by his magic. The two warriors quickly jump aside and continue their ascent, one grasping a sword, the other, a bamboo stick. Both of them quickly reach the peak and leap towards the hooded sorcerer. Unfazed, the sorcerer creates an invisible barrier and knocks the warrior with the sword aside, breaking his leg. Taking advantage of this chance, he rushes towards the fallen soldier, attempting to end his life. Suddenly, a projectile knocks the hooded man in the head. The other warrior had just thrown his bamboo stick, saving his comrade from death. However, he was now weaponless, and could do nothing more to help. The sorcerer cackled and said, “I’ll deal with you later. Now, where is the other creature?” With helpless eyes, the weaponless soldier looked at his friend, who lay on the ground, defenseless. His friend, however, smiled knowingly. He motioned towards the sorcerer’s back, and then looked at his own sword. Seeing what his friend wanted him to do, the weaponless soldier sprinted in the direction of the sorcerer and caught his friend’s sword just in time. With all of his might, he plunged the sword into the sorcerer’s back. SHING! The evil magician’s eyes widened in horror as he fell to the ground. The two victorious warriors were just about to celebrate when the sorcerer said his last words: 
“I may not be able to kill you, but…I will still let you pay the price.”

“CURSE YOU, YOU IMBECILE! YOU SHALL NEVER HEAL AGAIN, EVEN AFTER THE DAY HELL FREEZES OVER!”
CRACK! His eyes flew open as he jolted up from his bed. His clothes were drenched with cold sweat, and he was shaking with fear. Slowly, he took a few deep breaths, regained his composure, and trudged out of his bedroom. He was a tall monk named Kurma, with tired brown eyes and a bald head. Kurma plodded into the kitchen and whipped up his favorite meal: stir-fried vegetables with udon. After eating, he climbed up the stairs and arrived at the peak of Tai Shan. Hidden in the peaks of Tai Shan, there lies an ancient, mysterious temple, one only few knew existed. The cobblestone walls had already crumbled, and moss lined the cracked pavement. Kurma entered the small, ancient temple, situated himself on a shiny lotus throne, and started to meditate.
A few hours later…
After gaining enough life force, Kurma the monk decided to go to the village at the bottom of Tai Shan. For the last 10 years, he had tried to gain as much life force as possible by meditating. Life force was a mysterious form of energy that could only be gained by meditation (any other possible ways were exempted from Kurma’s knowledge). It would help him achieve enlightenment on the day his soul left the Earth. As he quickly descended the stairs surrounding Tai Shan (he had already done this thousand of times), he sang a funky little tune:

O my comrades, how are you,
Can you hear me sing this little tune?
May you always be in peace,
May you always be in one piece,
O do you know how much I miss you?

After singing this for 147.53 times, Kurma finally arrived at the foot of Tai Shan. He entered the small village right next to it (this village had excellent hot springs) and met up with the village elders. Usually, they talked about a variety of things, from growing crops to taking care of children, as well as politics to private matters, etc. This time, however, all of the village elders seemed very stressed. Their eyebrows were furrowed, their hands were fidgety, and they had very, very large dark circles under their eyes. Confused, Kurma asked the elders what was troubling them and if he could help. The elders ushered him inside the town hall, shut the door, and locked it. Kurma was quite surprised at the level of secrecy, and he began to realize that the situation was extremely grave. As he sat down, the elders began to address the situation.
“As you know, our king was a benevolent and kind person. He was frugal and always helped the people, no matter what. Our queen was also extremely wise, with great intelligence and a big heart. Yet, there are always vicious tyrants and corrupt officials that are blinded by their own desires. They will hurt people, use people, and even kill people to satisfy their unquenchable thirst for power and fortunes. And unfortunately, these monsters have the strongest armies in this world and will endlessly wage war on other kingdoms. Alas, our kingdom has the best economy in the world, so naturally we are their greatest target. One month ago, a mysterious tyrant marched his massive armies towards our borders. Within weeks, they crushed our walls, slaughtered our soldiers, and captured and enslaved our civilians. Just a few days ago, our king and queen got captured by the enemy, and they took control of our great kingdom. I have heard that the new tyrant has also imposed harsh laws and cruel punishments on our poor fellow citizens. Alas, alas! Our once bright, peaceful country has now become a desolate wasteland of lost and dead souls!”
	“WHAT!?” Kurma exclaimed. “How…how…no! This is not possible!” 
One of the elders shook his head and said grimly, “Well…anything is possible. Even the brightest stars may die and fade one day.” 
Kurma took a few deep breaths and attempted to calm down. He began to logically think about this problem and suddenly thought of an important question: “Village elders, I acknowledge that this is a very hopeless situation, and I am also extremely devastated. However, we must analyze the situation logically and devise a plan. To begin with, I have an important question: “Have there been any rebellions against this tyrant?”
One of the village elders answered, “This tyrant understands that the only things capable of defeating him are magic and potions. Due to this, he has started collecting energy crystals from all around the kingdom. These energy crystals are extremely powerful and are the source of the sorcerers’ powers. In addition, he has also outlawed the practice of brewing potions. Anyone caught by the royal guards will be executed, and their corpses will be thrown onto the streets to terrorize the civilians.”
	Attempting to hold his anger, Kurma asked again, “Have there been any rebellions or farmer uprisings?”
	“Alas, alas,” an elder responded. “The heroes ten years ago are now nowhere to be found. Even the two great warriors that defeated the hooded sorcerer and put our king on the throne have disappeared into the depths of the unknown.”
	“No…” Kurma thought. “How…how did our great king get captured? Did he not protect our king? Is he still not starting a revolt?” Abruptly, Kurma felt a sense of deep guilt. “I cannot blame him for not taking action. He may already be starting a silent rebellion. Alas, alas! I cannot help him, yet now I blame him! How can I slander him, my dear brother, like this!”
	Kurma’s eyes became red as he became overcome with guilt. The elders asked what was happening, but the monk knew he could not tell the truth. He said, “I am heartbroken to hear what has become of our great kingdom, yet I do not know what to do to help.”
	The village elders sighed and shook their heads. “The only thing we can do now is to try to hide our village from this cruel tyrant. We will try to disguise ourselves, but even then,I think the armies of that vicious tyrant will easily spot a village at the foot of Tai Shan.”
	Suddenly, Kurma had a great idea. He told the village elders, “I have an abundance of space in my temple, and there are also many small chapels along the stairs leading to the peak of Tai Shan. I think we may be able to house all of the villagers, although it may be a bit cramped.”
	The village elders grabbed Kurma’s hand as tears of delight streamed down their faces. “We thank you from the bottom of our hearts, O dear monk! Yet, will there be enough space in your abode? In addition, how will we get the elderly and our necessities up to the top of the mountain?
	With determination, Kurma said, “I believe that there will be enough space, and even if there is not, we can build a few more small cabins. As for the elderly and our necessities, I have a proposal: Since we have little chapels almost every 500 steps, we will first let the young and strong help us carry the necessities up the mountain on carts. Next, we will cut some wood and use it to make new cabins. Finally, when the time comes, we will escort the elderly up the mountain, taking breaks along the way. There are many trees and springs on Tai Shan, so we will not deplete our resources.”
	After hearing this, the elders could finally be at ease. With overflowing gratitude, they thanked Kurma again, and then went to meet with the villagers. It was already nighttime, so Kurma made his way up the mountain and arrived at his abode just before midnight. He trudged into his bedroom and collapsed onto his bed. He knew it was going to be extremely difficult to transport an entire village up the 5029 foot incline that was Tai Shan, but what choice did he have? With a heavy sigh, he said, “When will we meet again, my brother and comrade? How I wish I could go back to the days when we were fighting evil, side by side! How I wish…
“I could still go back to the days when I wasn’t helpless, when I was still free from that curse!”
To be continued…
Shadow Rebellion
By: Max Wang

20 Years Ago…
	“Master, what are we going to do in this room?” asked a frail, 10-year-old boy.
	“Today, we will see your potential,” said his master excitedly. “Over the centuries, us alchemists have established a tradition in which we determine a youngsters’ potential on their 10th birthday.”
	“But, master,” asked the boy worriedly, “what if I don’t have any potential?”
	“Don’t you worry,” his master reassured him kindly. “The first day I saw you when you were five, I knew you had some talent in those bones. Now, there are hundreds of supplies on these shelves. Follow your heart, your mind, and most importantly, your gut, and choose as many ingredients as you want to make a random potion.”
	“Really?” asked the boy excitedly. “So, I can use anything on these massive shelves?”
	“Yes!” his master replied. “Brew anything you want.”
	And with that, the little boy rushed into the storage and started rummaging through it. His master smiled and then exited the room.

12 Hours Later…
	It was already midnight, and the boy was still not done brewing his potion. The master started to worry about him, so he put on his hood and rushed out to find his student. Along the way, he found the little boy, who was also on his way to tell the master that he had finished.  Relieved, the master followed him into the room. To his surprise, the potion was completely clear. It looked just like water but even more transparent. Intrigued, the master took a whiff of it… and he almost fell onto the floor! It smelled… bitter, and in the world of alchemy, only the most potent, forbidden potions smelled bitter. Before the master could stop him, the little boy said, “Master, watch this!” as he drank the entire potion.
“NO!” his master cried, but it was too late. The boy… was gone! Horrified, his master called his name. “Amun? Amun!!”
“Master, I’m here!” replied the little boy, confused at why his master was fretfully calling his name.
“What… no, this cannot be!” his master murmured. Only the most potent, powerful potion… only the most skilled alchemist…”
“Master, what’s wrong! I can’t see my hands!” The little boy cried, horrified that he couldn’t see his own body.
“Ahhh… my child…” his master sighed. “Fate always surprises us in every single way possible!” He then revealed the astonishing truth.

	“Amun, you have just brewed the most potent potion in the world of alchemy, the legendary invisibility potion! You are destined to become a decider of fate, yet you must use your powers for good and survive countless dangers. I pray for your safety, but I can only help you for now…”

10 Years Later…
	“Master, what are we going to do on this hill?” asked a frail, 10-year-old girl.
“Today, we will see your potential,” said her master excitedly. “Over the centuries, us sorcerers have established a tradition in which we determine a youngsters’ potential on their 10th birthday.”
	“But, master,” asked the girl worriedly, “what if I don’t have any potential?”
	“Don’t you worry,” her master reassured her kindly. “The first day I saw you when you were five, I knew you had some talent in those bones. Now, here is an energy crystal, which is the source of our powers. We channel the energy of these crystals into our powerful spells, which range from destructive to healing ones. Here, take this one and absorb it like this.” The master made a quick hand motion, and the little girl followed suit. Immediately, the crystal dissolved, and her body absorbed the energy. “Excellent!” her master said. “Now, do any hand motion you would like, and at the end, push both of your hands out and face towards that hilltop right there.
	“Really?” asked the girl excitedly. “So, I can conjure any spell that I want?”
	“Yes!” her master replied. “Do anything you want.”
	And with that, the little girl faced the hilltop, put her hands out, and started. At first, she made some random hand motions, but then she became serious. The little girl looped her hands around each other, pulled them back, and then made a triangular shape with her thumbs and index fingers. Instantly, a triangle, circle, and square appeared, and they intertwined. Slowly, a purple ray of energy appeared, and it grew bigger and bigger until it started to engulf the little girl. “Help, master!” the little girl screamed.
	“Stay calm, stay calm!” the master said, astounded at how much energy the little girl had conjured. “Kali, if you feel like you can’t handle it anymore, push your hands forward and let go!”
	Hearing this, the little girl quickly pushed her hands forward. A huge purple beam charged into the hillside as the entire top of it exploded. Debris flew everywhere as the remnants of the hilltop came tumbling down.
	“M-m-m-master? What have I done?” the girl asked, horrified at what had just happened.
	“Ahhh… my child…” her master sighed. “Fate always surprises us in every single way possible!” He then revealed the astonishing truth.

	“Kali, you have just conjured one of the most destructive spells in the world of sorcery, the mythic comet! You are destined to become a decider of fate, yet you must use your powers for good and survive countless dangers. I pray for your safety, but I can only help you for now…”
10 Years Later…
	It was a dreary afternoon, with heavy fog that clouded the sky and blocked out the sun. Ever since the new king came, there had not been a single bright day. As people trudged towards the town square, royal guards took their positions on towers and near shops. In addition, a platoon of guards stood at every single one of the four doors, which corresponded with the four directions. Every day, the tyrant would enact new laws, and people would be forced to listen to them every day at the town square. Everyone dreaded this time of day since most of the laws were all harsh, and the punishments were extremely severe. Sometimes, a few rotting corpses would be put on stakes to terrorize the civilians! At the West door, a hooded man entered briskly, while at the East door, a hooded woman walked swiftly to the town square. They had arrived just in time to hear the new law:

“As the mayor, I hereby declare that the emperor has issued a strict ban on all alchemy and sorcery. Anyone caught practicing these forbidden arts shall be crucified and hanged on the stakes of this town square!”

	“WHAT!?” the two hooded people exclaimed at the same time. Their intense reaction caught the attention of the royal guards, and they knew at once that they had been uncovered. Although the two did not know each other, they understood that they would both be hanged if the royal guards captured them.
The hooded man said, “Here, take this speed potion and let’s bolt towards the North door!” Together, the two drank the potion and sprinted towards the gate, while the royal guards tried to stop them. However, the effects of the speed potion were too strong, and the soldiers couldn’t catch up with them. After running for ten minutes straight, the two finally stopped and panted for breath. Gasping, they told each other their true names and their background. The hooded man talked first and said, “My name is Amun, and I am an alchemist. I know how to brew many different potions, but the more powerful they are, the longer they take to brew. Right now, I am brewing a shield potion, which can protect us, but it will still take around five minutes. I have a jump potion ready, though, so we can use it now.”
The hooded woman said, “My name is Kali, and I am a sorceress. I can conjure a variety of spells, and my strongest one is a destructive comet that can destroy mountains in one blast if I charge it long enough. However, I need alchemy crystals to conjure my spells, and I only have three left.”
“Ahhhh…” sighed Amun. “I guess we are in a grave situation right now. Anyway, let’s get some provisions and escape this horrid place.”
“Agreed,” said Kali, and together the two set off to buy some provisions.

2 Hours Later…
	After eating a hearty brunch, the duo set off on their journey to the north. When they were just about to exit the large gate that led to a major trading route, suddenly, a large group of royal guards charged towards them. “Ahhh…” murmured Kali. “I guess we will have to fight our way out of this.”
	Amun replied, “There are too many royal guards. Let’s take a cut and hide in the wilderness.” And with that, the two sprinted into the woods, with the guards in hot pursuit. The speed potion’s effects had already worn off, so Kali and Amun were losing ground. Just when the soldiers were about to catch up, Kali conjured a blast and destroyed a few trees behind them. This blocked the path of the royal guards, so they had to dismount their horses and chase on foot. After a few minutes of non-stop running, the duo reached a dead end. They had ended up on a treacherous cliff, and there were clusters of sharp rocks directly beneath them.
	As the royal guards slowly approached, their leader shouted, “Die or come with us to die! The choice is yours!”
	Kali whispered, “Amun, do you still have the shield and jump potion?”
	Amun replied, “Yes, I do,” and handed her the potions.
	They drank both of them, and Kali yelled, “Brace for impact!” She charged up a huge purple comet and blasted at the cliff. Instantly, it exploded as Kali and Amun were blasted backward. They were protected by the shield potion, and the jump potion increased the explosion impact, so they successfully avoided the sharp rocks. The duo plummeted down thousands of feet and into the ocean with a monstrous, deadly crash. The guards, who presumed that they were dead, retreated back into the woods. As for Kali and Amun, all that was left of them was their two identical hoods, floating on the vast, empty ocean.

To be continued…
Horn of Justice
By: Max Wang

	Arcane Falls was a town at the foot of the largest waterfall in the kingdom, hence its name. Mist covered valleys surrounded the peaceful village, and a long, twisted river ran through the mountains, providing the inhabitants with fresh water and silt. This made Arcane Falls excellent for farming, and there was always an abundance of food after the annual harvest. The town was led by the Council of the Five Elders, and they organized the town so well, it developed from a few hundred people to around ten thousand people. The leader of the elders, interestingly, was also the youngest of them all: Enzo.

Ten years ago, a mysterious hooded figure arrived in the town, and he began as an artisan who made pottery. Slowly, he began to interact with the people in the town, and everyone thought he was a cordial, respectful neighbor. He introduced himself as Enzo, and said that he used to be a soldier for the benevolent king. As the years passed, Enzo became involved with the political affairs of Arcane Falls, and he quickly became known as a responsible and outspoken leader. In the fifth year he arrived at the town, Enzo became elected as one of the elders of the town. This was an extremely wise decision, as his leadership led the small town to new, unimaginable heights. He noticed that the town produced an abundance of food, and so he distributed thirty percent of it to storage and exported the rest. This opened a major trading route that passed through Arcane Falls, and the town soon became extremely prosperous from all of this trade. This also caused the population to skyrocket, and many skilled artisans and craftsmen flocked to the town for job opportunities. Furthermore, Enzo generously offered high wages to scholars, and soon enough, hundreds of scribes and educators immigrated to Arcane Falls, improving the education and public facilities. Finally, the wise leader took advantage of the geographical location of the town, and he actively advertised the town as a beautiful natural wonder. This attracted many tourists to Arcane Falls, which further benefited the economy. In a matter of five years, Enzo had become one of the most respected people in the town, and in another five years, he had turned Arcane Falls into a major trading center with advanced education and hundreds of tourists.

The Winter of the Tenth Year…
	“Sir, sir!” A scribe frantically rushed into the city hall, carrying a thick scroll.
	“What happened, Peter?” asked Enzo worriedly.
	“Sir, I just received a letter from my friend at Tai Shan, and it is directed to you. When I saw the cover title though…” Peter turned away, frightened, and he shoved the letter into Enzo’s hands. Enzo looked at the cover of the letter, and immediately turned white. It said:
Beware, beware! Our city walls have been breached, and our King has been captured!
	“WHAT!!?”exclaimed Enzo. The letter dropped on the floor as his hands trembled uncontrollably. “No…n-n-n-no…NO! My king! How…how…” and with that, tears streaked down his face as he fell off his chair and collapsed onto the floor, unconscious.

A few hours later…
	“Sir…sir! You finally woke up!” Peter exclaimed, delighted.
	“No…no…” Enzo covered his face with his hands and groaned painfully. “Tell me the whole story, Peter.”
	With an anguished expression, Peter told Enzo everything that had happened. “As you know, our king was a benevolent and kind person. He was frugal and always helped the people, no matter what. Our queen was also extremely wise, with great intelligence and a big heart. Yet, there are always vicious tyrants and corrupt officials that are blinded by their own desires. They will hurt people, use people, and even kill people to satisfy their unquenchable thirst for power and fortunes. And unfortunately, these monsters have the strongest armies in this world and will endlessly wage war on other kingdoms. Alas, our kingdom has the best economy in the world, so naturally we are their greatest target. One month ago, a mysterious tyrant marched his massive armies towards our borders. Within weeks, they crushed our walls, slaughtered our soldiers, and captured and enslaved our civilians. Just a few days ago, our king and queen got captured by the enemy, and they took control of our great kingdom. I have heard that the new tyrant has also imposed harsh laws and cruel punishments on our poor fellow citizens. Alas, alas! Our once bright, peaceful country has now become a desolate wasteland of lost and dead souls!”
	Without a word, Enzo suddenly rose from his bed and strode to his huge closet. As he opened the two wooden doors, he pressed a button hidden behind his clothes. Slowly, the back of his closet slid open, and a blinding light emitted from it. With blazing eyes, Enzo removed the two artifacts that he had kept hidden from the day he arrived at Arcane Falls. He pulled out an elegant sword with engravings on it and a huge, intricately designed war horn. These two objects emanated a stunning bright light, yet Enzo was unfazed. He unsheathed his sword, and read the words engraved on it: “The victor is not victorious unless the vanquished considers himself so.” He then blew his horn which unleashed a beautiful yet terrifying sound, and yelled into the sky, “Veni, vidi, vici!” Instantly, the ground shook, the mist in the valleys cleared, and the water in the river overflowed, splashing the fields. Enzo sighed with relief and said, “I guess it's time I go back to WAR.”

A few hours later…
	“Elders of the Council! I have called this meeting to discuss some breaking news. As you all probably know by now, the walls of our kingdom have been breached, and our benevolent king and queen have been captured. This new tyrant is extremely cruel, and his royal guards are searching for villages to conquer everywhere. From today on, we will never be safe from that tyrant, and so I have a daring proposal. I will personally start and lead a rebellion against that tyrant!”
	“What!? Enzo, are you out of your mind?” The oldest elder exclaimed. “If we start a rebellion right now, we will just be jumping into a pit of fire!”
	Already expecting this, Enzo explained, “My dear elders, our king and queen were the most benevolent rulers we have ever had. They strengthened our economy, made our country peaceful, and did a hundred times more than what I did. Yet, when that vicious conqueror came, our king was defenseless, as none of us had the power to defend against that tyrant’s ferocious royal guards. However, he has one great weakness: His harsh laws and cruel punishments have caused outrage amongst the people, and they are all waiting for someone to liberate them. As the center of a major trade route, Arcane Falls has everything needed to start a rebellion–people, food, provisions, etc. As for how to carry out this operation, I have an artifact that will aid us.” And with that, Enzo pulled out his large war horn and blew it. He yelled, “Veni, vidi, vici!” Instantly, the ground shook, the mist in the valleys cleared, and the water in the river overflowed, splashing the fields. Suddenly, all of the elders felt a rush of confidence, a sense that they could do anything and stop evil. With pride, Enzo said, “Elders of the Council, I present to you…the Horn of Justice.”

	The Next Day, Town Square…
	“Settle down, everyone, settle down! Our fellow elder Enzo has something to say to you all.” The Elders of the Council stepped aside as Enzo walked to the center.
	“My friends! As you all know, our great king has been captured, and our city walls have crumbled like sand, all because of a vicious tyrant. His laws are harsh, his punishments cruel, and he has also doubled our taxes! Throughout our country, citizens like you are dying on the streets, either starved to death or hanged on stakes. In a matter of time, that desolation will also sweep our peaceful town of Arcane Falls, and we will all be devastated by the tyrant’s fierce royal guards!” An outbreak of distress and outrage erupted in the large crowd gathered around Enzo. Smiling to himself, he continued. “Will we let this tyrant win? No! Will we let him sweep our lands and take away everything that we love? No! Will we let him slaughter us, one by one, until we all fall under the sword of his royal guards?”
	“NO!!” The crowd screamed in unison.
	“Then, let us rise together! Together, we will fight for our freedom, fight for our kingdom, and fight for our families. Today is the day in which we stop this cruel tyrant from taking everything away from us. Call your brothers and sisters, tell everyone you see: We will not stand for this injustice anymore! The oppressed shall rise, and nothing will stop us. The people outnumber the guards one thousand to one, and together, with our united will, we shall conquer anything that stands in our fight for freedom, for justice. Arise, my brethren, arise! VENI, VIDI, VICI!” The crowd erupted into cheers as the people started chanting, “VENI! VIDI! VICI!” In the midst of this, Enzo raised the Horn of Justice and blew as hard as he could. An arousing sound swept over the people, and they all felt a strong feeling of confidence and passion, a sense of motivation for a better future. The elders, impressed with how well Enzo could lead the people, immediately gave him permission to start gathering people for the rebellion, and they also began to prepare for battle.
	After giving his speech, Enzo immediately started to spread word of the rebellion and attract potential recruits. Since Arcane Falls was the center of a major trade route, Enzo took advantage of this opportunity and notified all of the traders who came to the town. The traders then went back to their hometowns and told everyone there about it too. In a matter of a few weeks, almost half of the entire kingdom knew about the rebellion. This, however, also attracted the attention of the royal guards. Thankfully, Enzo was able to know of this beforehand, and he deceived the leader of the royal guards by disguising the town. They were tricked into believing that Arcane Falls was just advertising for the annual harvest. After enough people had been attracted by this call to arms, Enzo spread the word that he would be giving a speech talking about the rebellion on the night of the harvest. That day, tens of thousands of people flocked to Arcane Falls to hear Enzo’s speech. There, Enzo gave the same speech, but he made it longer and included living, relatable examples. At the end, while the crowd was chanting “VENI, VIDI, VICI”, Enzo raised the Horn of Justice and blew it again. This time, with so many people supporting Enzo, the sound of the horn blasted across thousands of miles, even going as far as the capital. The sound aroused the spirits of the crowd and gave them a strong boost of confidence and motivation. This time, even the fainthearted were not afraid to start a rebellion. 
That night, Enzo started to recruit soldiers for the army. In a matter of a few weeks, he had already amassed an army of nearly 50,000 dedicated rebels. He meticulously planned an army formation based on how skilled each recruit was, and Enzo was even able to find a few experienced generals. Every day, he woke up at 5:00 and trained the troops, day and night. In a short amount of time, he had already built a standing army from scratch. It consisted of 30,000 fierce infantry, 10,000 swift cavalry, and 10,000 accurate archers. Enzo’s arsenal was composed of 30,000 swords and shields, 10,000 spears, 10,000 crossbows, and more than 500,000 arrows. He had acquired all of these weapons from a distant village in the mountains, which specialized in metal workings. Finally, Enzo received all of his provisions from his own town of Arcane Falls, as this year’s harvest had produced a much larger surplus than usual. In the spring of Enzo’s eleventh year at Arcane Falls, he set off with his men on a journey to the North. With around a thousand ships provided by the islanders of Xenoxia, his army set sail from the river that wrapped around Arcane Falls. For days, they sailed through the mountains, enjoying the pleasant sight of the rolling hills and countless valleys. On the fifth day, Enzo’s army had finally arrived at the vast ocean, with him at the front of the fleet. That day, as the sun reached its peak, his scouts reported that they had spotted two black dots amidst the vast ocean. Confused, he urged his men to go forward at full speed, and he was greeted by a horrifying sight. The two black dots were actually two bodies, floating on the empty ocean. Frantically, Enzo’s soldiers quickly found a rope and tied a skilled sailor to it. They lowered him slowly until he could reach the two bodies, and one by one, he rescued them from the ocean. The soldiers brought the two unconscious figures to Enzo, and he immediately ordered the ship nurse to find rooms to accommodate the two rescued people, who were still in a coma. After that, Enzo continued to set sail on the ocean and advance to the North.
That night…
	As the night crew, composed of twenty people, were getting ready to take the deck, Enzo returned to his captain’s quarters to rest. Before sleeping, however, he quietly entered the sick bay to check up on the two rescued victims, who were still in a comatose state. Sighing, he sat beside them and checked their temperature. They're recovering, Enzo thought to himself as he took out his legendary Horn of Justice. Gently, he blew a soothing sound that rejuvenated the spirits of the sailors and also the two unconscious bodies. Slowly, they opened their eyes and groggily asked each other if they were in good shape. Enzo, startled that they had already woken up, hurriedly introduced himself and his ship. The two mysterious people sat up and intently listened to his story. As he finished, Enzo said, “...and that's what's been happening. Now, I am also quite curious to know who both of you are and your backstories.” Smiling, the duo introduced themselves.
	The man said, “I am Amun, and I am an alchemist.” The woman said, “I am Kali, and I am a sorceress.”
To be continued…
Kurma: The Warrior of Immortality
By: Max Wang

Recap: On Tai Shan, there lived a monk named Kurma. He used to be a war veteran with his brother, and they defeated an evil sorcerer in order to put their own king onto the throne. Yet, before the sorcerer died, he cursed Kurma and removed his regenerative abilities. Due to this, Kurma hid his identity and became a monk on Tai Shan. One day, as he was visiting the village at the foot of Tai Shan, he received news that a vicious tyrant had taken over their kingdom and captured their king. The elders were also extremely worried that the tyrant would find their village and conquer it too. Kurma quickly devised a plan to transport the entire village to his abode on Tai Shan. First, he let the young and strong help him carry the necessities onto Tai Shan on carts. Next, they cut down some wood and built many new log cabins. Finally, Kurma and the villagers got ready to escort the elderly up the mountain. Yet, just as Kurma set foot on the stairs, a large commotion erupted behind them…

	“THE GUARDS ARE HERE!!” yelled the villagers in unison.
“WHAT?!” Kurma exclaimed. “No…this cannot be!” Hundreds of royal guards on swift horses stampeded towards the crowd as the elderly desperately tried to run away. Kurma, knowing that he would certainly die if he fought the guards, sprinted up the mountain to call for reinforcement. He quietly slipped away as the elderly were mercilessly pinned onto the ground and tied up. In around ten minutes, he arrived at his abode and told all of the villagers about the critical situation. Immediately, everyone rushed down the mountain with pathetic sticks and rocks that wouldn’t even dent in the royal guards’ armor. Kurma rushed into his house and retrieved something that he vowed he would never use again: his bamboo stick that he used in the war against the evil sorcerer. With renewed vigor, he sprinted down the mountain and quickly caught up with the rescue squad. Together, they rushed down the stairs and leaped towards the unsuspecting guards…and started whacking them with sticks and stones. The guards just laughed and laughed as Kurma snuck up behind them and smashed the ground with his bamboo stick. Instantly, five guards were knocked unconscious, and the rest were blown back by the supersonic force. Horrified, the guards backed up as Kurma charged towards them… and found that hundreds of royal guards had already surrounded him. With their superior numbers, the guards advanced towards him. Although Kurma used the supersonic attack again, one of the soldiers was still able to approach Kurma and stab him in the back. Kurma spit out blood from his mouth as he kneeled in agony on the floor. Suddenly, a flurry of rocks pummeled the royal guards as they turned away from the doomed monk. Taking advantage of this, Kurma slipped away into the forest with his last bit of strength. He collapsed beside a tree with anguish and knew that it would be his final resting place. As tears streamed down his face, Kurma let out all of the life force he had stored for ten years. With both regret and hope, his soul slowly left his body as rays of enlightenment shone through the clouds…
	
Suddenly, Kurma began to regain his consciousness. Confused, he looked down at his body… and discovered that his wound was gone! Bewildered, he looked up and saw that the rays of enlightenment were gathering in one spot. A piece of parchment slowly descended from the nine skies and rested on the ground next to Kurma. He quickly picked it up and read it aloud:



O Kurma,
‘Tis not the time for you to depart from this wretched yet beautiful world. There are still many evils that you must vanquish and even more trials that you must face… yet this time, you will not be helpless, nor will you be alone. The life force within you is a mysterious, potent form of energy that can be converted into unimaginable power. With it, you can heal yourself in the midst of battle, and you can also heal others. In addition, you can use your life force to greatly empower your attacks. Apart from meditation, you can also gain life force by doing justice, such as protecting the villagers from harm. In the near future, you will meet many new friends and foes, and you will eventually reunite with your brother, who in fact is already starting a rebellion. Remember at all times, Kurma: Be steadfast and loyal, and never succumb to darkness. In the face of evil, seek justice, and reinforcements will always come your way. Farewell, O Warrior of Immortality. With the proper decisions, you will arrive at unimaginable heights!
Sincerely,
The Watcher of the Nine Skies

	After reading this, Kurma felt a rush of enlightenment and courage, and he knew he was ready to take down the royal guards. As he was about to set out on his journey for justice, he suddenly heard a majestic, arousing sound that gave him a strong feeling of confidence, passion, and a sense of motivation for a better future. Kurma recognized that sound… in fact, he was the first to ever hear that sound… “My brother!” Kurma exclaimed in delight. “If the Horn of Justice still lives… then a massive rebellion shall be starting soon! Wait for me, O brother! I am coming!” He sprinted out of the woods and was met with a horrifying sight. The royal guards were ruthlessly chaining the villagers and shoving them into cramped cages. With fury that had been suppressed since the day he heard about the tyrant, Kurma channeled a huge amount of life force into his attack and slammed his bamboo stick as hard as he could onto the ground. Instantly, the impact produced a sonic boom, causing a major disturbance in the fault line, generating a level 5 earthquake. The royal guards were all blasted back hundreds of meters and into the woods, where they lay unconscious. Surprisingly, the villagers were unfazed by Kurma’s attack, and none of them seemed to be affected by the earthquake. Quickly, he rescued the villagers and brought them to the foot of Tai Shan. Unfortunately, the earthquake destroyed some of the stairs leading to his home, and so the villagers were left stranded. Abruptly, rays of enlightenment shone from the nine skies again, and another parchment arrived. It said:
O Warrior of Immortality,
It seems that you have indeed made this power your own. You must be wondering why the villagers were not harmed by your attack. This is because life force only damages people that should be damaged, and the extent of the damage also varies based on the individual. Some of the royal guards that you attacked will be unconscious for three days, while others will wake up in a few minutes. This is because some of them wanted to help the tyrant, while others were innocent villagers forced to join the military. Although your attacks have unimaginable power, Kurma, remember to conserve your life force and meditate often. You can also use your life force for movement, which will be particularly useful for the situation you are in right now. Now, as a final thought, remember to always be humble and treat everyone equally with respect and kindness. Everyone can harness the power of life force, yet they have to be taught by someone… like you.
Sincerely,
The Watcher of the Nine Skies
	
With this enlightenment, Kurma channeled his life force into his bamboo stick and used it to weave the shape of a dragon. Just as he finished, a huge eastern spirit dragon produced by his life force appeared and roared into the sky. Grinning, Kurma told the villagers to hop on, and they made a majestic ascent onto Tai Shan.
	
	After everyone settled into their new homes, Kurma began to search for recruits to spread the teachings of life force. Immediately, every person in the village volunteered to become his students. Even the elderly joined, as life force could reduce aging. Day after day, Kurma taught them how to meditate and channel their energy into power. He also taught them wise lessons and the importance of justice and karmic retribution. After a few months of training, Kurma had already amassed a few talented youths who were able to break trees without even touching them. In addition, he had also taught the rest of the villagers how to heal their own wounds and also slightly empower their attacks.

	In spring, Kurma decided to set out on a journey to rescue his king and defeat the cruel tyrant. Along with him, he brought his most talented students and forty other loyal students. Together, they became the Fifty Monks of Tai Shan, with Kurma being the Master of Life Force and his most talented students being the Nine Dragons, each representing a different sky.

	A few days into their journey, the Fifty Monks arrived at the seaside. They saw a huge fleet of ships approaching, and they also saw that the leader of the army was carrying a sword that emanated a stunning bright light. Kurma was seemingly unfazed by the bright light, and he murmured to himself, “What a majestic sword with a familiar gleam… could that be him?” Abruptly, an arrow whizzed above his head and snapped him out of his thoughts.
	“We are under attack!” Yelled one of the monks. Immediately, Kurma pulled out his bamboo stick and rushed to the rescue along with the Nine Dragons. Ten royal scouts were fighting with a few of the monks, but they seemed to be having no problem dealing with them, as their life force greatly empowered their attacks. Kurma told the Nine Dragons to end it quickly, and so they sent out nine air slashes created by their life force. The scouts were knocked back by the slashes, and they lay defeated on the ground. Kurma told them that he would spare their lives, but they had to lead the monks to their military base. The scouts turned out to be villagers who were forced to join the military, and so they gladly led them to their headquarters. Kurma noticed that the soldiers there were preparing fire arrows to launch at the ships, so he led the monks in a surprise attack against the royal guards. In a matter of a few minutes, the entire camp had surrendered to Kurma, and he let them go after confiscating their weapons. He looked down from the cliff and saw that the rebellion fleet was being attacked by one of the tyrant’s largest, most formidable fleets. Kurma knew that the battle would be arduous, and so he knew he had to provide help. He channeled a major portion of his life force into his bamboo stick and leaped off the cliff. As he plummeted into the water, he plunged his weapon into the depths and released all of the power stored inside. Instantaneously, it created a 6-degree earthquake, thus causing a large tsunami to sweep the enemy fleet. The rebellion fleet took advantage of this and charged forward, demolishing the royal guards. After all of the ships had been obliterated, the lead ship sailed towards Kurma as he erupted out of the water while riding on a spirit dragon. The leader of the rebellion walked to the front of the ship and shouted, “I am Enzo, leader of the rebellion! Who are you, O mighty warrior?”
	With tears brimming in his eyes, Kurma exclaimed, “O honorable Enzo, I am your brother Kurma!”
To be continued…
Child of the Void	
By: Max Wang

A dark, dreary night,
With no moon in sight.
In the shadows of an abandoned alleyway,
A little girl shivers in her rags, trying to survive another day.
No family, no love,
They had all been disposed of.
She screams into the night, to no avail,
Ready to end this torturous tale.
With nothing but bread crumbs,
To the dark she succumbs.
With only a rusted knife and a ripped-out soul,
Living day by day is just an endless black hole.
She smiles, for once, and raises the knife,
Her heart is no longer able to see the light.
With only hatred for this wretched world,
She plunges into the underworld.
Before she left, she made one wish:
CURSE THIS WORLD, MAY IT FOREVER SINK INTO AN ENDLESS ABYSS!
…
…
And there went the little girl,
Another cursed, wretched soul.
A once kind heart, young and bright,
Darkness came and sucked out the light.
The cruel tyrant, cold and harsh,
Turned this kingdom into an abandoned marsh.
It was prosperous, once upon a time,
It used to be so sublime.
The girl’s body crashes to the ground,
It makes an eerie, crackling sound.
The bones crack, the blood drips,
All in the wake of a solar eclipse…
…
From the depths, the ground shakes,
Signifying the void dragon’s wake.
It bursts out of the ground, revealing an endless abyss,
Letting out a terrifying, monstrous hiss.
It swallows the body, and drags it down,
Into the abyss and beneath the ground…
…

	The void dragon rested the girl’s body on the ground and flew into a deep cave. In a few minutes, it returned with many alchemy crystals. The dragon drew the power out of the crystals and channeled it into the girl’s body. Slowly, her eyes opened, and she let out an agonizing scream due to the pain. Yet, she looked at the terrifying beast with a dull expression, not the least afraid. The void dragon opened its monstrous mouth and roared. “Why are you not afraid of me, puny child?”
	“You have revived me, and I have no will to live. Why would I be afraid?” The girl muttered.
	Abruptly, the void dragon laughed. “Hahaha! Indeed, I have found the right one. You have earned my respect, and your intentions are the same as mine. I offer you a deal: If you become my vessel, I will grant you with the power of the void. With it, you will reach unimaginable heights, including… killing anyone, including the one you wish to tear limb from limb!”
	“Yes…” The girl said, her dull eyes letting out a dark glow. “Yes! Grant me the full power of the void! Allow me to return to that wretched world, allow me to massacre those imbeciles!”
	And with that, she was consumed as she fainted on the ground…
…
	“Ughh…” The girl stood up and stretched her limbs. She took a deep breath and knew instantly that she would never be the same again. She felt the power coursing through her limbs as she let out a terrifying scream.
	“Calm down…” A voice in her head echoed. “Now, down to some important matters. I must first apologize that I have not even introduced myself. I am Kháos, χάος in Greek, and I am the last void dragon. Our species had been defeated by the sorcerers due to a dispute over alchemy crystals, and they banished us from ever returning to the Overworld. Thus, I need a vessel to exit the Void, which is you. Together, we can conquer anything and everything. I see that your intention is to kill the tyrant, and my intention is to kill the sorcerers. So, why don’t we kill them both, together as a team? Now, may I ask you to introduce yourself? There is no need to speak, as we can communicate with our thoughts.”
	“I am Aella,  Ἄελλα in Greek, and…” Suddenly, tears streamed down her face and she kneeled onto the ground. “I…used to be so happy…when my family…was still alive. I was once from a middle class family, and we made a stable income on trading. I went to school and made many friends, and it seemed like that there would be eternal peace and prosperity. Yet that tyrant came…our city was devastated by his merciless guards; shops were raided, schools were destroyed, and people were brutally massacred. And…” Aella pounded her fists on the cold, hard ground. “My parents and all of my friends were killed right in front of me! My school was bombarded by cannonballs, and my parents were hung on stakes because they traded alchemy crystals. I must take my revenge, I must tear that tyrant limb from limb! Vengeance shall be mine, and it shall be served in cold blood.” And with that, she transformed into a void dragon and flew towards the Overworld.
Three days later…
	“Kháos! I understand that I have immense power, but why do I not have tracking abilities? It’s been three days, and I have not seen a single royal guard, much less a sorcerer!”
	“Calm down, for Void’s sake! I know that you are desperate for blood, but you really need to think strategically. Why are you even searching in an abandoned forest? Do you really think that we will find any – wait. I sense… alchemy crystals… which means there is a sorcerer nearby. Get ready, it is time to kill…”
	“Why are we killing sorcerers? They didn’t do anything to me.”
	“They didn’t do anything to you, but they banished the void dragons! Now, if you want to keep your powers, go kill that sorcerer, and I will help you kill that tyrant.”
	“Fine.” Aella muttered and crept towards a rustling bush. Her left eye emitted a dark purple glow, and she swung her left hand. Instantly, she summoned a void dragon claw that teared in the direction of the bush. Kchhh! Blood dripped on the ground as the bush was sliced into pieces.
	“Nice, nice. Now, where is the body?” Asked Kháos.
	“I don’t know. I presume it must be –” Aella’s thoughts were interrupted by a powerful, magically charged punch in the face. A normal person’s skull would have been shattered by this blow, but Aella was simply knocked back, unfazed. The sender of the punch was a figure shrouded in a black hood, and there was blood dripping from their cheek.
	“Who are you, and why do you attempt to kill me!” The mysterious figure shouted. Without even speaking, Aella leaped forward and sent out another dragon claw. This time, it slammed into the ground, causing a shockwave that obliterated the nearby trees. Surprisingly, the figure was able to conjure a shield that completely negated the damage. With some distance between the two, the sorcerer absorbed an alchemy crystal and readied a powerful spell. They looped their hands around each other, pulled them back, and then made a triangular shape with their thumbs and index fingers. Instantly, a triangle, circle, and square appeared, and they intertwined. Slowly, a purple ray of energy appeared, and it grew bigger and bigger until it engulfed the sorcerer.
	“Uhhh…this sorcerer is no normal opponent. That spell looks oddly familiar…as if it was the one that killed my species!” Kháos exclaimed. “Quick, RUN AWAY!”
	Aella leaped to the side as a huge purple beam charged towards her. Instantly, the forest behind her exploded, and purple flames surged towards the sky. Her right arm was badly charred, and her dragon scale defense lowered significantly. “Ughhh…guess it’s time to end this once and for all.” Aella sprinted towards the figure and spread her arms wide. When she got close enough, she thrust her hands towards the sky, summoning a huge void dragon head from the ground. The sorcerer was pummeled into the trees, and they lay there helpless as the merciless Void Vigilante stomped towards them. Just as she was about to finish the job, a powerful kick in the stomach sent Aella flying into the sky. “WHAT!?” She exclaimed as she crashed into the forest terrain. As she stood up, another punch sent her crashing into the woods. In the distance, the sorcerer’s body was lifted up…by air? It seemed as if they were floating above the ground, which Kháos thought was extremely suspicious.
	“Aella…your dragon scales are almost done regenerating, so I advise you to go investigate what in the Void is happening.”
	Silently, Aella crept towards the body, which was still levitating in the air. Slowly but surely, she began to see that the sorcerer was not floating. Instead, they were being carried by another figure shrouded in a dark hood.
	“Who are you, and why are you tampering with our battle?!” Aella shouted.
	Before she was even able to get answers, the figure zoomed to her side at blinding speeds and sent an empowered punch, pounding her onto the ground. The figure then whizzed back and stuffed a potion into the unconscious sorcerers’ mouth. Instantly, the sorcerer was revived, and they stood next to the hooded figure.
	“Aghhh!” Aella screamed as she leaped up from the ground, furious. “Tell me your names, before I tear you limb from limb!”
	“Haha!” The hooded figure laughed. “If it’s winning battles and escaping from death, then nobody can surpass us! I am Amun, an alchemist, and this is Kali, a sorceress!” Amun motioned towards the woman next to him. “Now, who are you, and why do you stop us from defeating that cruel tyrant?”
	“What? I despise that tyrant, and I wish to kill him. Yet, the creature inside me wants that sorceress’ head, and so I must kill her. Now, step aside before I slaughter you too!”
	“Well then, let’s fight!” Kali exclaimed.
Amun handed her a rainbow potion, and said, “This potion is a mix of strength, speed, and shield that I just brewed.”
“Say less!” Kali replied, delighted. And with that, the three people charged towards each other, thus starting another epic fight. With supercharged potions, potent magic, and strength in numbers, the Shadow Rebellion was able to quickly subdue Aella.
“Well, that was pretty easy,” Amun chuckled. “Can’t believe you almost lost.”
Kali groaned, “Hey, you can’t be talking. This girl, or creature, is quite strong. So don’t let your guard-” KCHHH! Aella summoned a huge dragon head out of the ground, sending Kali and Amun flying. Thankfully, they were protected by the shield potion, or else they would have been torn into pieces. “Told you!” Kali yelled as she charged another comet. This time, Aella didn’t mindlessly charge towards the duo. Instead, she let out a terrifying scream and stomped the ground. Instantly, the sky turned dark, and a chasm opened beneath her. Kháos rose from the depths and Aella mounted him as they charged towards the Shadow Rebellion.
“Uhhh…we might be cooked, stewed, and deep-fried,” whispered Amun. Just when they were about to give up, an arousing sound swept through the forest. Kali and Amun felt a strong feeling of confidence, passion, and motivation. On the other hand, Aella heard a piercing, horrifying scream that shattered her eardrums.
“Ahhhh! What is this monstrous sound?!” screamed Aella. “Who is stopping me from tearing you both apart!”
“Not on my watch,” said a voice from behind.
“Now, who are you!?” yelled Aella in fury.
“All you need to know is that I am Enzo, leader of the rebellion, and that no one is harming my army and my friends.”
“Even if you have strength in numbers, nothing will stop me, as I have the full power of the void dragons! Every time I am knocked down, I come back stronger than ever before!” Aella said as Kháos started to charge a void beam directed at Enzo. As he released the huge purple blast, a spirit phoenix charged straight into it, creating a massive explosion which decimated the trees in the forest. BOOM! In the midst of the ashes, a figure wielding a bamboo stick appeared.
“Fear not, my friends! I have come to help!” yelled Kurma.
“Yes, brother! You arrived just in time,”chuckled Enzo.
“Wait a minute… I am sensing a mysterious and potent form of energy in that monk’s body… ISN'T THAT LIFE FORCE!? If so, then he must be from the Nine Skies… which means we should better RUN FOR OUR LIVES!” Kháos screamed inside Aella’s mind. He immediately turned his head and tried to fly away.
“Alright rebels, you all know what to do,” said Kurma. He created a spirit dragon from his life force and followed Kháos in hot pursuit. Meanwhile, Kali charged up a comet and sent it straight into Kháos’ side, which shattered his dragon scale defense. Enzo brandished the Sword of Valor and sent a light sword slash into the void dragon’s unprotected flesh. Kháos let out an agonizing scream and stopped in midair while the spirit dragon charged towards him. Kurma did a backflip and leaped off his dragon just in time to avoid the explosion that ensued after the spirit dragon crashed into Kháos and Aella. The collision of the dragons of the nine skies and the void caused a supernova that sent a sonic boom to the royal capital, 1000 miles away. Instantly, Kháos disappeared as Aella fell from the sky, unconscious and burned by the explosion. “Quick, Amun, catch her!” Yelled Kurma.
“On it!” Amun replied as he drank a speed potion and sprinted towards the doomed girl’s landing spot. In a few seconds, he carried her back to the rebels with a disgusted expression on his face. Kurma looked down at Aella and grimaced. Her left arm, which was the one she used to attack with, had been blown apart by the explosion. Her right eye had also been destroyed, so she now had a black hole in her eye socket. Kurma transferred some of his life force into Aella to keep her alive, while Amun gave her a healing potion.
“Alright, she should be fine, as void dragons are practically unkillable,” Kurma said as his head clouded with thoughts.
“So…what are we going to do now?” asked Enzo.

To be continued…

Messenger of the Wind
By: Max Wang

	“Uhhhh… I don’t really know how to proceed.” Enzo sighed.
	“Me neither.” Kali agreed.
	“How are we supposed to convince Aella?” Asked Amun.
	“I honestly don’t really know,” replied Kurma. “Fortunately, she has not woken up yet, but if she does, she most certainly will take revenge on us and attempt to slaughter Kali.”
	“Oh, bruh.” Kali shook her head. “Should we jail her up, or just end it once and for all?
	“No, we must try to save as many people as possible,” replied Kurma. “She loathes the tyrant with a passion, and with her power, our forces will be unmatched, therefore guaranteeing us a win in this war.”
	“But, my brother, how are we going to convince her? In addition, we cannot advance any further, as we do not know what treacherous forces the tyrant is hiding,” stated Enzo.1
	“Well then, I have a risky yet effective proposal. We will send a capable spy to collect information about the tyrant. Additionally, there was a rumor around camp that they once spotted a void dragon being controlled by the tyrant. If this is confirmed,  we can use the information as leverage to get Aella to give us her services to help with the rebellion,” Kurma suggested.
	“Excellent idea, Kurma. However, who is skilled and brave enough to do this?” Questioned Enzo.
	“Well, we will just have to find someone in our army,” Kurma sighed.

Later that afternoon, in the rebellion camp…

	It was a windy afternoon on the plains, but the soldiers in the camps were nice and cozy. A young soldier named Gale left the camp, as he wanted to go for a walk on the vast, beautiful great plains. Interestingly, he was never a big fan of leisurely walks, especially in the cold wind, but today, there seemed to be a mysterious force luring him out of the camp. Unbeknownst to Gale, on this fateful day, he would receive his destiny…
	
	As he strolled in the soft, tall grasses, Gale’s attention was suddenly caught by a shadow rustling in the leaves. Alarmed, he pulled out his blade and prepared to fight a wild beast, or so he thought. After waiting a while, he shook off his paranoia and continued to walk calmly. This time, however, he was much more alert.. A few minutes later, the shadow presented itself to Gale once again. Gathering his wits, he began to give chase to the entity, and unknowingly, he was being led further from his camp. A guard witnessed this, calling out to him to come back, yet Gale could not hear him. As he chased the figure, the winds began to get more and more intense. Gale was almost knocked down by the howling winds, but he quickly went back on hot pursuit. Abruptly, a sudden yet strong torrent of wind tore at Gale, pushing him aside, and he was sent tumbling. Unfazed and determined, Gale got up again and sprinted towards the shadow. Despite the fact that his stamina was starting to wear thin, his sheer will pushed through, and he began one last final sprint towards the figure. Although the immense currents were beating him back, he was able to gain ground on the figure. When he was right behind the entity, Gale leaped and caught… nothing? He collapsed on the ground, gasping for air, as he looked at his empty hands. He looked into the sky, and the winds were calm and comfortable, a warm autumn breeze. Gale couldn’t believe it. All this time, he was just hallucinating, and he nearly ran a marathon to chase a shadow of his imagination. As he cursed himself for being stupid, he walked back toward his camp, which was just a line on the horizon. The sun began to set, and Gale knew he would most definitely be late for dinner. As if he were controlled by a mysterious force, he turned and went back to the spot where he had last seen the shadow.  Abruptly, Gale's body became limp, and his body started levitating above the ground as if someone was lifting him by magic. Moments later, his eyes became gray, and he took out his sword and planted it in the ground. Instantly, howling winds began to rise, and they swirled around his sword. Gale was lifted into the air, and before he even knew what was happening, he disappeared inside his sword…

	Slowly, Gale opened his eyes, and he was shocked to see that he was surrounded in all directions by howling winds. They arranged themselves in a huge, destructive swirl, and Gale knew that it was a hurricane. However, he was in a surprisingly calm area of the storm with no winds at all. He realized that there was only one possibility: He was in the eye of a hurricane. Just then, he noticed that his sword was floating in midair, and he touched it. Instantly, a hooded figure jumped out of the sword. Gale stumbled back, yelling in shock, as he leaped and punched the figure straight in the face. However, like before, Gale felt that he had just stuck his hand through the wind.

	“Woah, calm down!” Yelled the hooded figure, who didn’t seem surprised at all for being in the eye of a hurricane.
	“Who are you, and why did you bring me to this place?” Demanded Gale.
	“Yes, you must have a lot of questions, and I will answer them, one by one. But first, to some more pressing matters. Who gave you this sword?
	“My sword? It’s my most precious possession, passed down to me by my father before he passed away. His last words were for me to inherit his sword and oppose all of the evil in the world.”
	“Well then, I believe these were not his final words, am I correct?”
Gale gasped. “How-how do you know?” After pausing for a moment, he said, “Indeed, those were not his final words. My father told me to tell this to the person who asked for his last words: O great gods, alas, I have failed you! I did not fulfill my destiny! Yet, I have a son who has great willpower and speed, and I believe he will be the Messenger we have been waiting for. As for me, may the wind carry my body away, and may my eyes be open forever, as I can never rest in peace because I have failed to fulfill my destiny.”
The mysterious figure recoiled in shock. “No! How can he say such a thing? Fate is an unpredictable thing, and he has already done so much good in the world…”
“Ummm…” muttered Gale, “Do you know my father?”
“Yes, I did. I knew him very well,” replied the figure. “Now, I think it is time to tell you who you are. You are the son of a Gust, a person destined to become the Messenger. You, your father, and I are all blessed by the wind, a natural force with unlimited bounds. Yet, only a few in these millennia have been able to fully harness the difficult power of the wind. Your father said that you had great willpower, and I saw some of that when you were chasing the shadow, which was in fact me. I am a Breeze, and I reveal to Gusts their identities and tell them their destiny. Now, it is time for me to tell yours. You will become a spy and messenger for the rebellion, relaying messages and information about the tyrant’s secret forces. If you are able to harness the power of the wind, you will be able to fulfill your destiny and overthrow the tyrant.” Slowly, the hurricane began to calm, and the Breeze started to fade away.
“Wait!” Yelled Gale frantically. “I still have a thousand unanswered questions!”
“Young one, you know the wind cannot stay still for long, and that there are no breezes in hurricanes. Good luck, Gale, or should I say, Messenger of the Wind. Fulfill your destiny, seek justice, and firmly oppose all evil! May the wind be your guide…” The Breeze disappeared, and Gale was sucked into his sword again…

Gale awoke on the great plains again, in the exact same spot where he had left. He looked into the sky with wonder and amazement, and slowly pulled his sword out of the ground. Ecstatic to try out his new powers, Gale brandished his sword in the air, trying to control the wind, but to no avail. Frustrated, he drove it into the ground, causing the winds around him to swirl and eject outwards, producing a shockwave. Startled and astonished, he took a deep breath and flourished his sword once more. This time, however, he raised it into the sky. Howling winds began to gather around the tip, and after Gale thrust the sword forward, it sent a potent wind blast which left a dent in the ground. Stunned at his newfound power, his sword clanged on the ground, and he nearly fell to his knees. After waking up from his stupor, he finally noticed that it was night. Calmly, he began to walk back to his camp again, this time without turning back. Suddenly, Gale had an excellent idea. Once again, he summoned the winds, but instead of thrusting it forward, he thrust it backward. As expected, he was blasted forward and fell face-first into the ground. Now walking with a bruised face, he grinned, finding a sense of satisfaction with his little experiment. Afterwards, he continued the same procedure of summoning the winds, but this time, he gently positioned his sword backwards. Amazingly, the winds pushed him forward, and he cruised through the sky at any speed that he desired. In no time, Gale arrived at his camp and quietly slipped into the large crowd gathered outside. It seemed that the rebellion leaders had assembled all of the troops to call for a vital meeting. The esteemed leader Enzo stepped onto the stage, and the soldiers began to cheer and hoot, including Gale. Enzo, welcoming the applause with a nod of his head, began his speech. “My fellow soldiers and friends, I have called for this meeting to announce a plan that my brother Kurma and I have devised. As you all know, our rebellion has been going quite well, yet we still cannot advance onto the tyrant’s capital. We do not know what treacherous forces he hides,  so blindly charging in would be foolish. As many of you have heard from rumors, we recently captured a demon. However, the demon is in fact a girl who has a pact with the last void dragon. She also resents the tyrant, and with her power, our victory will almost be inevitable. Thus, we must try to gather enough information from the capital to persuade her to join our cause.” The crowd of soldiers began to whisper amongst themselves, as they were uncertain what Enzo was planning. Smiling, he continued. “Under these circumstances, Kurma and I have agreed to send a capable spy to collect information from the tyrant’s capital. Yet, this mission is, without a doubt, incredibly hazardous. Only the most courageous and skilled warriors can qualify. So, who is up for this challenge?” Instantly, the soldiers erupted into heated conversations as they predicted who would be the one to embark on this dangerous, if not suicidal, mission. However, one soldier didn’t participate in any of these conversations. As soon as Enzo announced his plan, Gale confidently strode to the front of the crowd, and as he walked, the soldiers stepped out of his path, just like Moses when he parted the Red Sea. Enzo was quite surprised, as he didn’t think anyone would be brave enough to accept this job. He asked, “Who are you, O brave warrior? Are you not afraid of death?”
Gale answered, “O honorable Enzo, my name is Gale, and I would have never participated in this job if you had asked a day, or even a few hours ago. Yet, I recently had an enigmatic encounter with a powerful entity, who revealed to me that I have the ability to harness the power of the wind to my own desire.
“Oh? Such interesting and unexpected twists and turns that fate can subject us to. Before I send you on your way, Gale, could you show me your power of the wind?”
Gale nodded. “As you wish, sir.” With all of his willpower, Gale raised his sword to the sky and yelled. Clouds began to gather around the camp, and they swirled faster and faster, reaching incredible speeds as Gale let his power engulf the camp with immensely strong gusts. The grass on the plains was torn from the ground as the clouds poured buckets of rainwater outside the camp. Yet, the weather inside the camp was peaceful, and the winds were calm.
In awe, Enzo exclaimed, “Who are you, O mighty warrior? Have you been hiding your magnificent powers all of this time while you were in my army?”
Gale looked into the sky and laughed. “Esteemed Enzo, my honorable commander, please refrain from giving me so much respect. I had just learned of these powers today, and this was the first time I ever tried to generate a hurricane. There is only one thing I implore: please send me to be your eyes and your ears in the tyrant’s capital, and I will collect any information that you want. Please allow me to fulfill my destiny and become the Messenger my elders have been waiting for. Please.”
“Of course, Gale. You are the one I have been waiting for, and I will supply you with anything you need to complete this mission.”
“Thank you, O great commander. And for the matter of supplying me, there will be no need. All I need is my Hurricane, my blade, and my guide, the wind. ”
“Well then, it seems that you are eager to be on your way. Farewell, Gale, and we all wish you the best of luck!” Enzo and the soldiers began applauding, and amidst the cheering, Gale channeled the wind into his blade and blasted off into the night sky…

A few hours later…

It was a pitch black night, with no moon in sight. The once radiant, beautiful capital had become dreary and full of despair. People stayed in their homes, frightened of the outside world and the tyrant. Only the bravest civilians would periodically go out to buy necessities, but they would also nervously look back with every step they took. As Gale approached the town square, he saw giant pillars that dictated the tyrant’s harsh laws, and above them were rotting corpses of civilians hanged for treason. Hundreds of royal guards solemnly barricaded every entrance, yet Gale could see the fear in their eyes. Realization hit as he looked around, and it was then that Enzo’s words came back like a sharp current of wind to him. He realized that what the commander said was true: most of them were frightful, innocent civilians forced to join the military. Seeing the dreadful state in which the capital had turned into, rage and hatred filled him for the cruel, vicious tyrant. Instantly, howling winds began to rise, and as they picked up speed, they ripped apart the tyrant’s war flags. The soldiers ran to take cover nearby, and amidst the chaos, Gale silently glided overhead and headed directly towards the grand palace, his fists clenched in a fury…

	Quietly, Gale slipped into the ironically glorious palace of the cruel tyrant. As he entered through a high-arched, stained-glass window, he was furious to see that while the civilians were living in such dreadful conditions, the tyrant was living in such luxury. The walls were covered in quartz and silver, the roof and the colossal pillars were made of gold, and everything was adorned with precious jewels. In addition, diamond chandeliers with golden chains hung from the rooftop, and countless statues made out of pure gold decorated the endlessly long hallways. Gale tried to find his way around, but the palace was just too massive. After nearly an hour of searching, he finally found an immense staircase that led to a huge golden gate. He knew that it had to be a place of great importance, yet it was impossible for him to enter. Abruptly, Gale had a crazy and impossible idea: He would become the wind and enter through the gate’s cracks. He knew it wouldn’t work, but he still wanted to try. Gale channeled all of his energy into his thoughts, and amazingly, Gale felt his consciousness leaving his body and becoming one with the wind. He slipped through the cracks and entered a gigantic room made out of obsidian and gold. In the center, there was a large table with four people gathered around it. The one on the throne was the tyrant, without a doubt, but who were the other people? Gale saw that the one directly across from the tyrant was a knight holding a purple sword gleaming with power from the void. The two on the sides looked like a sorceress and a jester, and it looked as if these four were quite happy. The sorceress began speaking in a soft, deceiving voice. “My glorious king, I have excellent news to tell you. The knight went on a quest to battle a void dragon, and after he weakened it, the jester and I tamed it. I currently have it jailed up, and after a “treatment”, it is now ready to be Your Majesty’s pet. It will be absolutely loyal to you, and it will kill any enemy with a passion. With it, my king, you will be invincible!”
	The tyrant cackled. “Very well, very well! With my new “pet”, I will tear that rebellion apart limb from limb, and feed their corpses to this potent creature! What a beautiful sight that will be… I shall administer my plan very soon!”
	Gale was stunned and horrified, as he knew that void dragons possessed the power to demolish armies if they used their full strength, especially when they were not contained by a vessel. Yet, there was also some good news: if the tyrant was imprisoning a void dragon, then there would be enough information to convince Aella to join the rebellion. With enough collected information, Gale attempted to slip out of the cracks again. Yet, just as his soul entered his body, he saw that royal guards who patrolled the palace noticed him and one of them shouted to raise the alarm while the others gave chase. Gale turned pale as he needed to pull off an escape from the massive palace without alarming the tyrant. He surveyed his surroundings and saw that there was a huge window directly across from him in a long hallway. Since the guards were still one corridor away, Gale hurriedly threw on a set of gold armor for protection. As the soldiers advanced on him, Gale put on his helmet and unsheathed his trusty blade, Hurricane. He called the night currents and thrust his sword backwards, blasting him forward at high speeds. As expected, Gale crashed into the window and got flung into the night sky. Unfazed by the impact due to the armor’s protection, he quickly adjusted the positioning of the wind and soared into the night sky with all of the information he needed…

To be concluded with the finale…
Sunrise
By: Max Wang

At the rebellion camp…
	“General, general! The demon girl has awoken and is wreaking havoc in our camp!” A scout reported to Enzo with a fearful expression.
	Enzo’s eyes widened in terror. “What!? She has awoken from her wounds already?” He hastily arose from his seat and sprinted towards the site of destruction. When he got there, he was horrified to see soldiers on the ground everywhere. Thankfully, they were all alive and merely shaken by blunt force. Confused, Enzo looked into the distance and saw Aella attempting to punch the soldiers with her unwounded fist. The soldiers just dodged, as they knew they needed Aella to join the rebellion in order to defeat the tyrant. With a sigh, the rebellion leader pulled out his Sword of Valor and flicked it in the direction of the furious girl. A swift light beam was produced and struck Aella onto the ground. At that moment, the Shadow Rebellion and Kurma arrived at the scene. The heroes surrounded the Child of the Void and Kurma addressed her calmly.
	“We don’t want to harm you, and we also don’t want to imprison you. You see, we even let you rest in a comfortable, unguarded room. However, the moment you awoke, you began attacking our soldiers. Right now, I just want to ask why you are attacking them, and why you were even attacking us in the first place. What have we done to you? If we have offended you previously in any way, my friends and I will immediately apologize sincerely to you. But, we need to know the reason first.” Aella was evidently taken aback by Kurma’s statements. She was quite surprised by the kindness and humility they displayed even after her unprovoked attacks. 
Aella stood up and replied, “I attacked the sorceress because the void dragon inside me seeked revenge against sorcerers and sorceresses because they eliminated his kind many years ago. In fact, I have no grudge against them, but I must satisfy the dragon’s wishes in order for him to help me kill the tyrant.”
	As Aella explained the situation, Kurma sank into deep thought. He knew Aella would be a valuable asset to the team, but he could not allow Kali to be killed. Just as he was about to explain his dilemma, a figure descended from the sky. Gale had arrived at the perfect time with vital information, and Kurma could not have been more glad. He reported that the tyrant had a knight, sorcerer, and jester under his command, and he also said that they had recently captured and tamed a void dragon. Upon hearing this, Aella bowed to the heroes and pleaded for their forgiveness. Seeing that Kháos, the void dragon, had submitted, Kurma ecstatically granted Aella a full pardon and led her back to camp to treat her wounds. Enzo immediately gathered the soldiers and announced that they would be heading to the capital the next morning, and he also appointed Gale as the general leading the charge.
A few months later…
	For months, the army marched towards the tyrant’s capital. They strolled through the great plains, trudged across the desert, hiked the majestic mountains, waded the murky swamps, and wandered through the magnificent forests until finally, they arrived. The capital had lost its previous glow of happiness, peace, and prosperity. Streets and stalls lay deserted, the doors and windows to houses were bolted shut, and corpses were hung on stakes everywhere. In the distance, on a hill, lay a magnificent castle: the palace of the tyrant, which he had obtained through doubling taxes and imposing forced labor. With anger burning in his eyes, Enzo turned towards the rebellion army.
“My family, my friends, my people! Today is the day we arrive at this capital, today is the day of the final battle, and today is the day we defeat that tyrant and take our kingdom back!” The crowd hooted and cheered in delight. “However, the tyrant and his forces are unimaginably strong. It is without a doubt that we will suffer losses.” The soldiers looked at one another as fear flashed in their eyes. “But do not fear!” Enzo shouted. “Today, we fight for justice, and destiny will be on our side. Remember what the tyrant has done, and channel your rage, your sadness, and your hatred into an unstoppable force! From the day we started this journey, we refused to be oppressed. And so we fought hard and marched on, conquering towns by towns, cities by cities. Today is the last step of our conquest, the day our names will be cemented in history. Let us face this fateful day with unwavering courage and passion, and let us fight for our family, our friends, our kingdom, our brethren, and our future. VENI, VIDI, VICI!” As Enzo blew the Horn of Justice, the rebellion army charged at the capital with Gale as their leader.
	The army was halted by the royal guards as they approached the city gates. A cavalry of void minions riding dark horses rode to the front, and they were led by a void squire. Gale dismounted his horse and walked forward to meet him. He said, “Who are you, and why do you halt us in our path? Friend or foe, state your name first!”
	The squire said in a cold, robotic voice, “I have come to demolish the rebellion, and if you are one of them, I will slaughter you this instant.”
	Gale sighed. “I see you are about to fight us right now. However, I have an offer for you. I challenge you to a duel, and the leader who wins will be able to advance their army.”
	The void squire cackled. “No matter what happens, I will quash the rebellion. But… I would enjoy tearing you limb from limb first. I accept.”
	“Then let us begin. My friends, clear the way!” The two armies parted as the void squire and Gale stood on opposite sides of the arena.
	“Your call,” Gale shouted. Surprisingly, the void squire simply raised his hand into the sky. Confused, Gale looked around. Big mistake. An instant later, the squire summoned a blade made from void energy and lunged at superhuman speeds at Gale. Thankfully, he was able to send out a gust of wind to parry the hit, or else he would have been sliced into pieces. He quickly pulled out his Hurricane Blade and clashed with the void squire. Their swords danced as embers flashed from the impact. Gale locked blades with his opponent and held him in a stalemate. He summoned winds from all directions and blasted it from the tip of his blade, sending the void squire flying. Seeing that Gale had the upper hand, all of the void minions charged towards him, turning the tides quickly. Kurma told the Nine Dragons (his elite disciples) to assist Gale, and they quickly evened out the battle. The Nine Dragons were skillful masters of life force, and so they were able to quickly subdue the minions by utilizing energy beams and empowered melee attacks. By now, the battle was completely in the rebellion’s favor, and it seemed that it would be a decisive victory. Gale swiftly advanced towards the void squire to end the battle. As he raised his sword to deliver the finishing blow, the squire kneeled down, as if he was surrendering. Just as Gale’s sword was about to pierce his armor, the tyrant’s minion suddenly lunged at blinding speeds. In the blink of an eye, the Hurricane Blade went flying out of Gale’s hand into the air… and right into the void squire’s sheath. Appalled, Gale looked at his empty hand, flabbergasted at what just happened. He had severely underestimated the power of the void squire, as the seemingly defeated soldier had performed an advanced flash counter on Gale. Before he even had the chance to react, his opponent’s blade had already pierced through Gale’s chest. He fell down in agony as blood flowed from the open gash. The triumphant squire raised his bloody sword above the defeated hero’s corpse and cackled. Yet, as he was walking away from the battlefield, a powerful gust of wind knocked him down face-first onto the rough terrain. Stunned, the void squire looked behind him and saw Gale floating in the air behind him.
	“What… what!? This cannot be!” Kurma appeared beside the undead warrior and chuckled.
	“Do you really think it is that easy to slay a hero of the rebellion? Or, should I say, the Chosen One of the Wind?” Gale’s eyes turned gray as winds swirled at high speeds around him. He raised his hand to the sky, gathering all of the whirling air around him into one massive, powerful, destructive, terrifying tornado. Kurma infused a large amount of life force into the formidable force of nature, and the Messenger of the Wind sent the tornado straight towards the tyrant’s army. As chaos erupted in the enemy lines, Kurma, Enzo, Kali, Amun, and Aella flew towards the palace on a spirit dragon. They were about to duel the tyrant and his elite forces and end everything once and for all.
	The dragon burst through the tall stained glass windows of the palace and the heroes rolled onto the ground. In front of them, there were three corridors: One led to the left, one led to the right, and one led straight ahead. After a brief discussion, they agreed that Kali and Amun would go to the right, Enzo would go to the left, and Kurma and Aella would go forward.
	“Well, this is going to be fun,” Amun chuckled.
	“Yeah,” replied Kali. “Hopefully we can deal with the enemy as quickly as possible so we can help our friends.” Amun rummaged inside his pocket and pulled out two rainbow potions, which contained strength, speed, and shield.
	“Take one of these beforehand, as there might be traps ahead,” the alchemist said as he handed a potion to Kali.” They drank the brew and continued to walk forward until they came to the center of a massive multi-floor library. The Shadow Rebellion stood on the bottom floor and admired the rich collection of valuable volumes. Abruptly, a tiny rock blasted at high speeds towards Kali’s head. Thankfully, she was able to dodge it due to the effects of the speed potion. Surprised, she looked up and saw a sorceress and a jester standing on the top balcony.
	“Well, well, well. What have we here,” said the sorceress in a soft, deceiving voice. “Isn’t this the famous Shadow Rebellion, the dynamic duo that escaped the hands of death?”
	Smiling, Amun replied with confidence. “Yup, that’s us. I assume you are the sorceress and jester that Gale talked about?”
	“Indeed, that is us!” Answered the jester in a merry tone. “As a jester, of course, I must make a joke. What do you call someone who opposes our glorious king?”
	“Well, I think any person in their right mind would call them a courageous hero fighting for justice.” Amun replied with a smirk.
	“That is quite a witty answer, but no. You should call them… dead.” The jester replied cheerfully.
	“Bro, shut your mouth. You are not slick.” Kali rolled her eyes. “I swear, your terrible jokes are the reason you got demoted to organizing books all day in a library, but you can’t even read the titles through your goofy mask.”
	“Ohhhhhh!” Amun chuckled in delight. “I would not take that if I were you. You just got completely roasted, cooked, and destroyed.”
	“Oh, don’t be so mean to me. I was just about to give you a present!” said the jester. He pulled out two presents from his pocket. He dropped one on the ground beneath him and threw one at the duo. The first present contained potent buffs, while the second one exploded when it contacted the floor. Kali and Amun jumped back while the sorceress started shooting minute meteors rapidly, as if her hands were a machine gun. The Shadow Rebellion dodged and weaved through the bullets as they sprinted towards their enemy. While the sorceress shot at the heroes, the jester continued to bombard them with explosive presents. Amun threw Kali a jump potion, and after they drank it, they leaped up to the top balcony and started a close-range melee battle. The fighters moved at blinding speeds and threw super-charged hits at each other. After a few minutes of intense brawling, the jester and the sorceress retreated, gaining distance from the dynamic duo.
	“Are you scared, lil bro?” mocked Amun. Unbeknownst to him, the enemy was preparing a powerful, explosive rain of fire…
	Enzo walked down the hallway on high alert, unlike the young duo. He knew that he was on his own, and that there were most certainly traps waiting for him. Indeed, the moment he stepped into the palace coliseum, the door slammed behind him, trapping him inside. A knight shrouded in a dark purple cloak entered the arena, standing directly across from Enzo. The rebellion leader shouted, “Who are you, mysterious knight? Have you imprisoned me, or are you also trapped?” The knight did not reply and continued to advance towards Enzo. Sensing an incoming duel, he reluctantly pulled out his Sword of Valor and walked cautiously towards the mysterious figure. The knight’s armor began to emit a purple glow as void energy crackled in the air around him. He pulled out a sharp sword adorned with shattered crystals and started to sprint towards Enzo. The hero took a look at the purple weapon and his eyes widened in horror. The opponent he was about to face was the legendary Knight of the Void, who wielded the ancient Inanus Blade. Enzo gritted his teeth and sent out a few light beams at the knight, but he immediately dodged them, with amazing dexterity and agility. The rebellion leader was forced to engage, and he was instantly shaken by the champion of the void’s strength. He was already at a disadvantageous position, and all he could do was parry while retreating. The knight ruthlessly persisted, dealing heavy blow by blow. He charged void energy into his next strike and performed a wide sweep, knocking Enzo back three feet. The hero quickly got back up, but he saw that his armor was deteriorating because of the knight’s void decay. The leader of the great rebellion blew the Horn of Justice, as he knew that this battle may well be his last stand.
	“Alright, Aella, you’re going to have to be the one who fights the dragon,” Kurma sighed.
	“I think I’m going to be fine,” Aella replied. “I mean, if I’m about to die, you can revive me, right?”
	Kurma chuckled. “Indeed, this is why I accompanied you. However, I heard from Gale that the dragon is being mind controlled, so we cannot kill it. If we are able to successfully rescue it, though, then the void dragons will be saved.”
	The heroes walked down a long corridor until they came to a large gate. They entered and were shocked to see the tyrant sitting on his throne and stroking the head of a void dragon.
	“Greetings, Kurma. You are quite famous in my kingdom as a wise, benevolent teacher and warrior. However, in reality, you are just a despicable, filthy rebel. But because of your popularity with the people, I’ll offer you a great deal, considering your current circumstances. Surrender right now, and I’ll keep you alive in captivity.”
	Kurma coldly replied, “You are even worse than I thought, you cruel, malicious tyrant. Today, I have come to take back my kingdom, and I suggest you surrender considering the current circumstances.”
“Looks like someone will be regretting their life choices shortly. But, who are you?” The tyrant cackled, looking at Aella. “Why are you here with these lowly rebels? Go, go back to your parents, puny girl. You should be learning about my glorious conquests in history right now.”
	Aella’s right eye glowed purple with pure hatred and fury. Her blown-off left hand had been completely replaced with a dragon claw, and her right eye had also been restored with the eye of a void dragon. “You… you… your existence is killing me right now. You are the most evil dictator this world will ever know. You know where my parents are? They were killed by you. You know where my school is? It was destroyed by you. And I would also be a corpse rotting on the streets right now if it wasn’t for Kháos. But here I am, ready to tear you limb from limb.” Aella lunged at the tyrant, but the void dragon flew in front of him and blocked the shot. With rage, Aella summoned the dragon head, but it did absolutely nothing to the impenetrable armor of the void dragons. The tyrant’s pet, getting annoyed, swiped her tail at the dragon girl and knocked Aella 10 feet, shattering her dragon scale armor. Kurma attempted to heal the fallen hero, but the tyrant flourished his hand and teleported himself and Kurma into a corridor. Back in the throne room, Aella finally summoned Kháos from the void and mounted him. “Alright, Kháos, do you think you can hold her in a standstill?” He nodded confidently, and the dragon girl steered him towards the manipulated pet.
	“WHAT!?” Kali screamed. The sorceress was bombarding them with explosive pellets that seemed to never stop coming. Amun threw Kali an invisibility potion, and they drank it to retreat before their shield broke.
	“Look who’s running now,” laughed the jester. “What, lil bro? Are you scared?”
	Behind a half burning bookshelf, Amun gave Kali a gray, swirling potion. He explained, “This is a new potion I’ve been brewing. It makes the opponent temporarily fall asleep when thrown at them, and so you can charge your meteor when they’re paralyzed.”
	“Alright, let’s end this quickly,” said Kali. She began charging a huge meteor as Amun swiftly and silently advanced on the unsuspecting enemy. At the right moment, he leaped up to the top balcony and hurled the potion at the sorceress and the jester. The instant he stunned them, Kali released the comet, completely obliterating her opponents to ashes.
	The moment the sorceress died, the tyrant’s pet started to lose control. She thrashed around and mindlessly rammed in all directions. Amidst the chaos, Kháos pushed his head against the other dragon’s head, creating a stalemate.
	The instant Enzo blew the Horn of Justice, a sound never heard before spread rapidly in a hundred mile radius. When it reached the ears of the rebellion soldiers, they instinctively raised their weapons into their sky and began chanting, ‘Veni, vidi, vici!’ The civilians of the capital also followed suit, and their gestures released beams of light that all flew to Enzo. Right away, the leader of the people felt an unimaginable power coursing through his veins. With glowing yellow eyes, he pulled out the Sword of Valor and sent a humongous beam of light that pierced through the Knight of the Void’s armor, annihilating him.
	The second the knight died, Aella felt a strong presence of uncontained void energy. As the two dragons struggled in their forehead war, she crawled onto the uncontrolled dragon’s head. The Child of the Void raised her hand in the air, collecting all of the energy the Knight of the Void had released. Aella slammed her hand down on the rogue dragon’s neck, creating a dark purple column that instantaneously subdued it.
“Kurma, it’s just me and you!” Yelled the tyrant as he flourished his hand, sending void beams at the monk in all directions. The Warrior of Immortality did not respond as he gracefully weaved through the bullets. Although the tyrant released more projectiles after each volley, Kurma just continued to heal his wounds. Infuriated, the cruel oppressor channeled all of his void energy into one nuke and blasted it at the monk. “Farewell, Kurma!” The dictator cried triumphantly…
	From the ashes, Kurma emerged unharmed, unscathed, and unfazed; a spirit phoenix had shielded him from the explosion. The tyrant’s jaw fell to the floor, and he was left both speechless and powerless. With glowing green eyes, the Master of Life Force conjured a spirit dragon and released it at the demonic ruler, finally ending the war…
	As the moon disappeared beneath the horizon, the heroes stood on a cliff overlooking the capital. Good had finally triumphed over evil, and the kingdom had been retaken. In addition, the king and queen had been rescued from captivity and reinstated onto the throne. Enzo looked down on the ruins of the capital and sighed. “Well, restoration is going to take a long time.” Kurma smiled at his brother and pointed to the rising sun.
	“Like the sunrise, our kingdom will always return better than ever before. Like the sunrise, we will always emerge from the horizon, triumphant. And every time we see the sunrise, we will know that it is a new day full of possibilities and opportunities to set things right.”

THE END
